 I. GENERAL POLICY 

1. Are there any constitutional provisions in relation to environmental protection and/or sustainable development? 
The Constitution of the Republic of Macedonia (“Official Gazette of RM” No. 52/91) and Amendments to the Constitution of the Republic of Macedonia (Decision for Proclamation of the Amendments to the Constitution of RM, “Official Gazette of RM” No. 52/91, 1/92, 31/98, 91/01,84/03) contains provisions regarding environment protection. Although the Constitution does not contain the term “sustainable development”, it contains articles referring to fundamental principles upon which the sustainable development is founded.  
Under the General Provisions of the Constitution, Article 8, paragraph 1, item 10, one of the basic principles of the fundamental values of the constitutional order of the Republic of Macedonia is space development based on urban and rural planning to promote and improve social wellbeing and protection and promotion of the environment and nature. The right to a healthy environment, as one of the Basic freedoms and rights of the citizens, is regulated in the Constitution of the Republic of Macedonia as a social right which guarantees the right of citizens to a healthy living environment. At the same time, citizens are obliged to improve and protect the environment, while the republic is obliged to provide conditions for the exercise of this citizens’ right (Article 43).  
The Constitution of the Republic of Macedonia specifies that the freedom of the market and entrepreneurship can be restricted by law only for reasons of the defense of the Republic, protection of the nature and environment or public health (Article 55). All the natural resources of the Republic of Macedonia, the flora and fauna, amenities in common use, as well as the objects and buildings of particular cultural and historical value determined by law, are goods of common interest for the Republic and enjoy specific protection. The law regulates the manner and conditions under which specific goods of general interest for the Republic can be ceded for use (Article 56). International agreements ratified in accordance with the Constitution are part of the internal legal order and cannot be changed by law (Article 118). The courts judge on the basis of the Constitution, the laws and the international agreements ratified in accordance with the Constitution.(Article 98, paragraph 2) Amendment XVII of the Constitution of the Republic of Macedonia specifies that “in units of local self-government, citizens directly and through representatives, participate in decision-making on issues of local relevance particularly in the fields of public services, urban and rural planning, environmental protection.” The Amendment IV of the Constitution of the Republic of Macedonia contains the key principles of sustainable development, i.e. it reads “The citizens of the Republic of Macedonia… taking responsibility for the presence and for the future of their fatherland, … and responsible to future generations for preserving and developing everything that is valuable…”.  The Constitution contains the three pillars upon which the concept of sustainable development is founded, those being: economic development, social equity and the environmental protection. Namely “The citizens of the Republic of Macedonia… have decided to establish the Republic of Macedonia as an independent, sovereign state, with an intention to… guaranteeing human rights and civil liberties, to provide… social justice, economic welfare and prosperity in the life of the individual and the community…”.(Amendment IV) The basic freedoms and rights of human beings and citizens as stipulated in the Constitution of the Republic of Macedonia correspond with the three pillars of the sustainable development, those being: The right to work, to free choice of employment… (Article 32) The right to social security and social insurance… (Article 34) The right to a healthy living environment … (Article 43). In addition, the Constitution of the Republic of Macedonia guarantees the right to education, the right to health care insurance, etc., and the republic is the entity that provides protection especially for mothers, children and minors and “provides special care and protection for the family”, etc.  
2. Is there a general environmental protection framework act, serving as a basis for other environmental legislation? 
Yes. In 1996, in line with the model of framework environmental laws of the Council of Europe, the Law on Environment and Nature Protection and Promotion (Official Gazette of RM No 13/03 consolidated text) was developed and adopted in the Republic of Macedonia. The Law has provided the basic legal framework of environmental protection and introduced the basic instruments of environment and nature protection and improvement, before that regulated by individual laws. The Law defines the rights and responsibilities of legal entities and natural persons in the areas of environment and nature protection and improvement; the development of planning documents in the area of environment, such as the National Environmental Action Plan (NEAP) and Local Environmental Action Plans (LEAPs); and stipulates the protection control mechanisms. For the first time the Law regulates the issues of environmental labelling, environmental monitoring as an integrated system, including environmental information system. According to the Law, the access to environmental information is free and such information is public. The Law also regulates the issue of environmental impact assessment, in a manner suitable to the circumstances in the Republic of Macedonia at the time of its adoption. The Law has provided for the establishment of the Fund of Environment, intended to support the environment and nature protection and improvement, as an economic instrument. Significant benefit brought by the Law was the establishment of the State Environment Inspectorate, as law enforcement instrument. The Law has significantly contributed to the development of environmental policy in the Republic of Macedonia and to the increase of the public awareness. With few exceptions, the Law on Environment and Nature Protection and Promotion has not been fully harmonised with the relevant EU Directives. In the last two years, the Ministry of Environment and Physical Planning has worked on the development of five environmental laws, including the Law on Environment as a framework law in the area of environment, which has transposed the segment of the Acquis Communitaire known as horizontal legislation, through the process of approximation of the national legislation to the EU legislation. The Draft Law on Environment is expected to be adopted by the end of the first quarter of 2005, see 22_Annex_01,. The Framework Law on Environment incorporates the basic principles of environmental protection, on the basis of which the relevant environmental management procedures are regulated. They are common to the principles of the laws regulating individual areas of the environment. The Law regulates the issues of access to environmental information, public participation in environmental decision-making, environmental impact assessment procedure, plans for industrial accidents controlling, as well as control mechanisms available to environmental inspectors. The Law places specific emphasis on integrated environmental permits, with regard to which it introduces the system of gradual adjustment to the required standards for integrated pollution prevention and control, through the introduction of integrated permits for compliance with operational plans, representing a condition for existing installations in the Republic of Macedonia to continue their operations.  
The major EU Directives transposed are: 
Directive 85/337/EEC as amended by Directive 97/11/EC on the assessment of the effects of certain public and private projects on the environment; Directive 2001/42/EC on the assessment of the effects of certain plans and programmes on the environment; Directive 96/61/EC on Integrated pollution prevention and control; -  Directive 2003/4/EC of the European Parliament and of the Council on public access to environmental information and repealing Council Directive 90/313/EEC; -  Directive 2003/35/EC of the European Parliament and of the Council providing for public participation in respect of the drawing up of certain plans and programmes relating to the environment and amending with regard to public participation and access to justice Council Directives 85/337/EEC and 96/61/EC; -  Council Directive 96/82/EC on the control of major-accident hazards involving dangerous substances; The following Directive and document have been taken into consideration: -  Proposal for a Directive of the European Parliament and of the Council on environmental liability in regard to the prevention and remedying of environmental damage (Brussels, 23.1.2002, 2002/0021 COD); -  Council Directive 91/692/EEC of 23 December 1991 standardizing and rationalizing reports on the implementation of certain Directives relating to the environment. This Law implements the requirements arising from the relevant international instruments ratified/signed by the Republic of Macedonia: Convention on Access to Information, Public Participation in Decision-making and Access to Justice in Environmental Matters (Åarhus Convention), (“Official Gazette of RM” No 40/99). -  The Convention on Environmental Impact Assessment in Transboundary Context (Espoo Convention), (“Official Gazette of RM” No 44/99). Protocol on Strategic Environmental Assessment to the Convention on Environmental Impact Assessment in Transboundary Context (Kiev, Ukraine, May 2003) The Draft Law on Environment is a basic law, which treats principally all environmental media and areas, including the basic global issues. It provides a foundation for the adoption of secondary legislation for the detailed regulation of certain issues related to the protection of the environment.  The Law provides a framework for the regulation of individual environmental media and areas, by the adoption of specific laws, including: Law on Waste Management (“Official Gazette of RM” No 68/04, 71/04), see 22_Annex_02,  Law on Nature Protection (“Official Gazette of RM” No. 67/04), see 22_Annex_03,   Law on Ambient Air Quality (“Official Gazette of RM” No. 67/04), see 22_Annex_04, and Draft Law on Waters, the adoption of which is expected by the end of the first quarter of 2005, see 22_Annex_05,. The process of the new legislation development in the Republic of Macedonia is carried out in accordance with the Programme for Approximation of the National Legislation to the Legislation of the European Union, as well as in accordance with the European Partnership Action Plan, according to which the emphasis in the coming period shall be placed on the adoption of specific laws in the areas of noise, chemicals and genetically modified organisms. In the framework of the CARDS 2005 Environmental Programme, activities have been projected concerning the approximation of the environmental legislation, aimed at estimating the required investments in the area of environment related to the acquis, as well as the responsibilities and obligations of the institutions in the Republic of Macedonia, and defining the time frame of the process of approximation to the relevant EU legal instruments. 3. What are the main principles regulating environmental legislation (e.g. polluter pays principle, precautionary principle, etc.)? 
The new legislation of the Republic of Macedonia in the area of the environment protection and improvement incorporates the EU Environmental Policy Principles, but it also devotes high attention to the principles of environmental protection bearing national, regional and local mark. Each of the laws, under separate chapters, determines the basic principles on which legal provisions are based.  
The Draft Law on Environment, the adoption of which is expected by the end of the first quarter of 2005, in Chapter II – Principles of environmental protection, contains the following principles:  
Principle of high level of protection obliges each citizen to provide high level of protection of the environment and of human life and health, while undertaking or performing activities. Principle of integration provides for the goals of the policy of environment protection and improvement to be integrated into other sector policies adopted by the bodies in the Republic of Macedonia (development, agriculture, transportation, etc.) Principles of sustainable development pose the obligation that, in undertaking or performing any activity, care should be taken for rational and sustainable use of natural resources, for the purpose of satisfying the needs for the healthy environment, as well as social and economic needs of present generations, without jeopardizing the rights of future generations to satisfy their own needs.  Polluter pays principle  imposes the obligation for the polluter to compensate for the costs of damage made in order to restore the environment, to the maximum extent possible, to the state before the damage.  The user pays principle is aimed at the user of resources compensating for the costs related to the sustainable development and environmental remedy resulting from the use of natural resources.  Principle of subsidiarity refers to the units of the local self-government which, within the scope of their competences determined by law, have the right and obligation to undertake, within their territory, all the measures and activities concerning environment protection and improvement, which are not under the exclusive competence of public bodies.  Principle of proportionality provides for the proportionality between the needs for development and the needs for environmental protection. Principle of prevention poses the obligation that measures and activities for environment protection are undertaken prior to the appearance of harmful effects.  Precautionary Principle reaches slightly beyond the principle of prevention and establishes a basis for undertaking necessary measures for the environment protection, in case of a well founded suspicion, rather than waiting for the available scientific evidence. Cleaner Production Principle  establishes grounds for introduction and endeavouring towards cleaner types of production techniques and processes in general, thus towards emissions and waste minimization.  Principle of international cooperation states that the Republic of Macedonia will take an active part in the regional and wider international cooperation in the area of the environment protection and improvement.  Principle of public participation and access to information obliges the bodies of the Republic of Macedonia (both central and local) to provide all necessary measures and prescribe procedures by means of which the right of access to environmental information and public participation will be provided and to specify conditions for the public participation in the process of all environmental decision making. Principle of increasing the public environmental awareness obliges the scientific, educational, health care, information, cultural and other institutions, including civil associations within the scope of their activities, to promote and provide for public awareness increase with regard to the importance of environment and its protection. 
The Law on Ambient Air Quality (“Official Gazette of RM” No. 67/04), incorporates the principles contained in the Draft Law on Environment but it also stipulates, under separate chapter, other principles closely related to air protection: Principle of careful and responsible behaviour referring to the activities that might have adverse impact on the quality of the ambient air, so that each individual is obliged to behave in careful and responsible manner, in order to avoid and prevent ambient air pollution and to avoid and prevent causing harmful effects on human health and the environment as a whole. Principle of time perspective –  the terms specified in plans, programs and decisions related to ambient air quality management should correspond with the time perspective of expected effects. 
The Draft Law on Waters, the adoption of which is expected by the end of the first quarter of 2005, undertakes some of the principles stipulated by the Draft Law on Environment (which puts the protection of nature at high level), but it is also supplemented by the following principles of sustainable water resources management: 
Eco-social economic concept defines waters as a part of natural processes requiring protection as habitats of flora and fauna in the environment. Water resources management is of public interest. Principle of the minimization of resources use provides for careful and rational use of water during the activities that might have impact on waters. Principle of integration  - this principle incorporates the integrated water management, from several points of view: mutual linkage between surface and ground water resources, their relationship with water dependent ecosystems and with other environmental media, the consent of directly involved institutions and users and the link with other sectors, the cooperation in matters related to transboundary water resources, as well as the integration of measures and activities for water protection into all development, strategic, planning and program documents adopted by public bodies and by the local self-government units. Polluter pays principle  obliges water polluters to compensate for the expenses for reverting polluted waters into their previous condition. The principle of compensation for expenses - A water user is obliged to compensate for all expenses arising from service delivery, including expenses related to the water resources used thereby and for the expenses related to the environment, in accordance with the polluter pays principle. Principle of pollution prevention at the source of pollution – Pollutant emissions shall be prevented at the source of their occurrence. Time perspective principle – according to this principle, the terms in plans and decisions for water resources management correspond with the time perspective of expected effects. Principle of stakeholders’ participation is a principle which obliges competent bodies to take into account the interests of all stakeholders in the decision making procedure related to water resources management and protection. 
Law on Waste Management (“Official Gazette of RM” No. 68/04, 71/04), apart from the principles stipulated under the Draft Law on Environment contains the following principles: 
Principle of environmental protection in waste management refers to the provision of a high level of protection of the environment, human life and health while undertaking activities related to waste management by legal entities and natural persons. At the same time, these are obliged to use raw materials the processing of which generates less waste, to apply technologies that provide for cleaner production and save natural resources. This principle indicates compulsory use of the Best Available Techniques (BAT) which is in the basis of Integrated Pollution Prevention and Control (IPPC).  Proximity Principle specifies that waste is processed primarily at the place of its generation, while waste that cannot be processed at the place of its generation, due to justified technical and technological or economic reasons, has to be transported for processing or be disposed of at the nearest sites determined for that purpose. Principle of universality of services –  Universality of services regarding waste management should be ensured through non-discrimination, service sustainability, quality and efficiency, transparency, economically affordable price and full coverage of the area of service delivery. Polluter pays principle  is identical to the equally titled principle in the Draft Law on Environment, only that it specifies that the waste generator and/or holder are obliged to bear all expenses arising from waste management, including expenses related to the waste collection, transportation, treatment, storage, disposal, prevention and monitoring, as well as expenses related to the remedial measures for the damage caused by waste or damage that could be caused by waste. System of deposit - When buying certain products, the buyer is obliged to pay some extra amount to the product price, which will be returned to him/her upon returning the used products and packaging back to the seller, provided that the used products and packaging can be processed and that this is marked in a manner specified in accordance with the law or other regulation.    
Law on Nature Protection (“Official Gazette of RM” No. 67/04), is, apart from the principles stipulated under the Draft Law on Environment, founded on the following principles:  
Principle of high level of environmental protection is identical to the equally titled principle of the Draft Law on Environment and of the particular Draft Law on Waters and Law on Waste Management, only that this principle emphasizes the protection of biological and landscape diversity, as well as of natural heritage. Principle of integration - establishes grounds for integrated nature protection in all development strategic plans and documents which are in any way related to nature protection.User pays principle  aims at the user of natural resources compensating for expenses for the maintenance of natural balance.  Principle of cooperation imposes the obligation on state administrative bodies, units of the local self-government and other organisations and institutions to observe, in the course of their work, the principles, the goals, the measures and the activities concerning nature protection and to implement mutual and international cooperation in full. 
4. Is there a national long term strategy related to environmental protection and sustainable development? 
Strategic determinations of the Republic of Macedonia in the area of environment protection and improvement have been defined and elaborated in the National Environmental Action Plan (NEAP), developed in 1996 with the financial support provided by the World Bank. The development of the second NEAP is underway (2004/2005), supported by the European Union CARDS 2001 (for more details see 22_I_ _ _P5In 2004, the Assembly of the Republic of Macedonia adopted the Spatial Plan of the Republic of Macedonia, which incorporates emphasized strategic development connotation and defines and establishes the basis, and at the same time feasible goals and directions of the development, especially with regard to the necessary qualitative and quantitative structural changes and the relevant and adaptable spatial planning solutions and options. This document constitutes the basis for the organisation, development, use and protection of space in the Republic of Macedonia, covering a 20-year period. The Study on the environment and nature protection, carried out within the framework of the Plan, specifies the goals and planning determinations for environment protection, as part of the overall activities in the field of spatial planning. The process of elaboration of many sector specific strategic documents that define development policies and contain action plans for the implementation of specified actions, incorporates the environmental sector, i.e. the impacts from other sectors on the environment protection and improvement). (for more details see 22_I_ _ _P12). The Republic of Macedonia is in the preparatory stage of developing the National Strategy for Sustainable Development and the Action Plan (NSSD and AP), during which several documents have been elaborated: „Conceptual approach for the creation and implementation of the National Strategy for Sustainable Development of the Republic of Macedonia”, 2000; „National sustainable development assessment of the Republic of Macedonia”, 2002; “Research concept supporting the creation and implementation of the National Strategy for Sustainable Development”, 2003.According to the Decision taken by the Government of the Republic of Macedonia, the Ministry of the Environment and Physical Planning (MEPP) has been appointed as a focal point for the activities aimed at the development of the National Strategy for Sustainable Development of the Republic of Macedonia. According to the National Strategy for Integration of the Republic of Macedonia into the European Union, the NSSD and AP of the Republic of Macedonia are among the priorities of the Government. In addition, according to the „Council Decision on the principles, priorities and conditions contained in the European Partnership with the Republic of Macedonia”, adopted on 09.06.2004, the need for developing the National Strategy for Sustainable Development  in accordance with the acquis,  including comprehensive plan for implementation of the recommendations specified in the conclusions of the World Summit of the United Nations on Sustainable Development, in Johannesburg, 2002” is stated under short-term obligations in PP 30: Environment.. Acting upon this Decision, the MEPP developed a plan of measures and activities, which has been incorporated in the European Partnership Action Plan. The commencement of the development of the NSSD and AP of the Republic of Macedonia is planned in 2005, and the adoption thereof in 2008, to be followed up by its implementation.   The Ministry of the Environment and Physical Planning financed the development of the Guide to Local Agenda 21 (2004), for the purpose of the development and implementation of local strategies and action plans for sustainable development intended for the local self-government units.  
5. Is there a concrete action programme for the environment with short and medium term objectives, means provided and a timetable? Is it linked to the EU environmental acquis and how is its implementation monitored? 
In the Republic of Macedonia the National Environmental Action Plan was drawn up (1996, supported by the World Bank). The legal grounds for its adoption are composed of the Law on Environment and Nature Protection and Promotion (“Official Gazette of RM” No.13/03 consolidated text). The priority goal of this document was to establish the basis for the introduction of environmental management system and to define the goals of environmental policies by areas, as well as the key challenges faced by the country in the period of transition in the field of the environment. It identified the sources of pollution, competent institutions, etc.  The development of the NEAP 1 was the first step towards the integration of environmental policy into the economic and social development programme of the country. According to its recommendations, the establishment of the Ministry of Environment and the Fund of the Environment, with appropriate organizational set-up and their own budgets, was set as one of the top priority actions.  The Action Plan defined the areas, the goals and the actions and determined the time frame for their implementation: short-, medium- and long-term, without identifying the sources and levels of financial resources required. In the period following the adoption of the document, the actions specified in the NEAP have been partially financed by the budget of the Ministry of Environment and Physical Planning, through the Fund of the Environment, as well as through external donations.  With regard to the monitoring of the process of implementation of the Action Plan, it is obvious that the document does not include such mechanism. Based on this fact and in accordance with the identified deficiency of the NEAP 1, the said mechanism will be elaborated through the process of the drawing-up of the second NEAP. In the context of the obligations of the Republic of Macedonia deriving from the Stabilisation and Association Agreement, the necessity to review the approach of the legislation, policies, mechanisms, etc., in the area of the environment has been noted, for the purpose of gradual implementation of the environmental acquis of the European Union. The process of the development of the second NEAP will take into account the terms for the implementation of the relevant EU Directives transposed, or to be transposed, into the Macedonian legislation, as specified in the Programme for Approximation of the National Legislation to the Legislation of the European Union. In this context, the terms for the implementation of the obligations specified in the new environmental laws (Draft Law on Environment, Draft Law on Waters, Law on Waste Management – “Official Gazette of RM” No. 68/04, 71/04, Law on Ambient Air Quality – “Official Gazette of RM” No.67/04 and Law on Nature Protection – “Official Gazette of RM” No.67/04), which have been fully harmonised with the relevant EU Directives, will be taken into account.  With regard to the above, the second NEAP will specify short- and medium-term goals/actions for environment protection and improvement, observing the terms specified in the National Strategy for the Integration of the Republic of Macedonia into the EU, the European Partnership Action Plan and the Programme for Approximation of the National Legislation to the Legislation of the European Union. The sources and levels of financial resources required for their implementation will be determined in general, taking into account the resources available in the country within the Budget of the Republic of Macedonia, the Fund of Environment and donors’ programmes that support projects in the field of environmental protection. The completion of the second NEAP will lay down the basis for the achievement of the following goals: 
Reform of the approach towards environment management (institutional strengthening in the area of monitoring, elimination of existing overlapping of competences between institutions and the establishment of a system and procedures that will provide for safe environmental management) Definition of frames of environment planning and management Definition and strengthening of institutional capacities regarding environment integration in economic and social areas/national progress in the process of sustainable development Facilitation in the process of transferring responsibilities in the area of the environment from central to the local level (decentralization)  Strengthening the intersectoral / interministerial cooperation Creation of favourable conditions in the Republic of Macedonia regarding environmental protection, financing and investments The second NEAP will contain the following chapters:  Introduction – development of environmental policy in correlation with the processes of sustainable development establishment, decentralization, and integration of the Republic of Macedonia into the European Union;  Policies and strategies for environment improvement and sustainable development, stakeholders involved and their roles; The state of the environment: air, water, waste, soil, nature and biological diversity, human health; Sectoral policies and their impacts on the environment: industry, energy, transport, agriculture, forestry, spatial planning, tourism; Mechanisms and instruments for: environmental management, institutional framework – interministerial and intersectoral planning, monitoring and evaluation of the environment and the process of implementation of the recommendations covered by the NEAP, financing and investment in environmental protection, economic instruments, public participation and access to information, etc. Setting priorities, goals and actions aimed at environmental quality improvement/Action Plan; Costs and potential financial resources for the implementation of the NEAP. 
6. How are you ensuring that your environmental legislation and policies are aligned with EU environmental legislation? What are the main difficulties encountered? Outline your investment plans and what you have done in the last 3 years to meet the demands of the environmental acquis. 
In order to provide an overview of the present status, institutions, mechanisms and planned activities in the process of harmonisation of the national legislation, as well as to determine the directions, content and dynamics of the legislation harmonisation, including the one in the area of the environment, the Government of the Republic of Macedonia adopted a number of documents: 
Programme for Approximation of the National Legislation to the Legislation of the European Union, which is updated on an annual basis and represents a control mechanism in the monitoring of the process of legislation harmonisation. Chapter 22 Environment refers to: the provisions of the Stabilisation and Association Agreement (SAA) which establish the basis for the obligation concerning the harmonisation of national legislation, the implementation deadline, the competent body, the overview of the relevant EU legislation, as well as the overview of the existing national legislation and the planned legal acts to be adopted. The Chapter is divided into subgroups, in accordance with the CELEX structure. The Ministry of Environment and Physical Planning is the competent body with regard to the harmonisation of the legislation referred to in Chapter 22 of the Programme for Approximation of the National Legislation to the Legislation of the European Union,.  -  Procedural Manual on the approximation of the legislation with that of the EU aimed at organizing the legislation harmonisation procedure in a uniformed manner and at delegating clear tasks to the competent bodies involved in the harmonisation process: on the manner of treatment, organization, coordination, reporting and control of relevant activities. The Procedural Manual contains: individual steps and activities that need to be taken by the Ministries, through the establishment of Working Groups (WGs) and Working Subgroups; the manner of submitting reports; etc. According to Article 103 and Article 68 of the SAA, the harmonisation of the environmental legislation is an obligation of the Ministry of Environment and Physical Planning (MEPP), which has established the internal institutional structure required for the process of harmonisation of the national legislation with the EU legislation. Namely, two Sectors within the MEPP hold the responsibility for the European Integration: Sector of European Integration and Sector of Legislation and Standardisation, which is responsible for the harmonisation of environmental legislation and leads the WG 22 – Environment under the Programme for Approximation of the National Legislation to the Legislation of the European Union  Taking into consideration the terms specified in the Programme for Approximation of the National Legislation to the Legislation of the European Union , the MEPP prepares a work programme each year, defining the activities planned in accordance with the Programme for Approximation of the National Legislation to the Legislation of the European Union. According to the experience of the Ministry of Environment and Physical Planning, the harmonisation of national environmental legislation with that of the EU has been so far achieved through: The establishment of inter-ministerial Working Groups for legislation harmonisation, which have developed into driving forces for most of the activities related to the drafting of legal texts and which created a platform for the development of the new environmental legislation compatible with the EU law. Members of the said WGs have been selected in such a way that a maximum possible balance of all stakeholders is achieved. Members of the WGs have been appointed upon prior official request by the MEPP and on the basis of the nomination from other stakeholders, including the relevant Ministries, governmental institutions, local self-government bodies, NGOs, business sector, the Economic Chamber of Macedonia and other organisations.  An Action Plan for Environmental Legislation Harmonisation has been developed to serve the needs of the MEPP, as a Guide on individual steps required in the domain of analysis and drafting of laws. Each WG consisted of a core group which has initiated and managed the activities, while the wider WG has provided the required consultations. The respective core groups have regular meetings, while wider groups meet at longer intervals (mostly once a month). The core groups are composed mainly of members representing the MEPP and other bodies, and whenever possible the international and local, senior and junior, technical and legal experts are involved. Each WG has its secretariat which organizes the meetings of the WG, prepares the agenda, takes minutes from the meetings and provides communication within both the core and wider relevant working group, as well as between the two of them. The secretariat also keeps records of the documents of the WG. Owing to such an approach, numerous institutions (both from the public and private sectors) are involved in drafting the relevant legal texts.  With regard to each Directive relevant to drafting the law, Tables of Corespondance are prepared in order to present, in a tabular manner, the status of transposition and the extent of compliance of the current law with the draft national legislation. For the purpose of informing the public on the obligations deriving from the new environmental legislation, as well as providing public participation in the overall process, public debates and workshops are organized at all stages.  Before the draft of the legal act is submitted to the Government of the Republic of Macedonia, a statement on its compliance with the EU law is prepared. This document includes all basic data on Directives transposed in the proposed legal act, as well as the relevant provisions of the SAA implemented through the legal act. One of the key challenges faced during the drafting of laws was the lack of knowledge on the requirements of the Directives by participants representing other sectors. In this context, additional workshops were organized to present the goals and the policy of each relevant Directive or other EU act.  Another problem was posed by the current division of responsibilities among the state administrative bodies in the Republic of Macedonia. Some of them demonstrated resistance to the need for redefinition of the competencies of individual bodies, resulting from the need for integration of the environmental policy. In the context of the above, additional problem was the lack of human resources within state administrative bodies, and this was solved by involving experts participating in projects carried out by the MEPP, as well as by involving external experts.  In the Republic of Macedonia, there is no unique environmental investment plan, which would specify investments required for the purpose of the implementation of the Acquis Communitaire. Investments are mostly carried out on the basis of the priorities set in individual national plans and programmes, as well as on the basis of terms specified in laws. In addition, when determining the investments, the obligations deriving from the SAA are taken as the criteria for investment also as well as the relevant EU Directives. In more specific terms, the National Environmental Action Plan (NEAP) has identified the priorities as well as the activities through which such priorities will be achieved. The activities indicated in the NEAP represent a frame for the allocation of financial resources of the Fund of Environment, the MEPP and the foreign donations.  Under the PHARE SOP 99 the initial analysis of the required economic, financial and administrative conditions for the approximation to the EU in the area of environment was completed. The document includes preliminary estimates of the expenses related to the required investments and the coverage of major investments arising from the EU high cost Directives. The document also contains an indicative frame for cost planning in the context of approximation to the EU and financial implications in environmental sectors requiring heavy investments.  With the support by the European Commission, through the Regional nvironmental Reconstruction rogramme for South Eastern Europe, the Priorities Environmental Investment Programme for South Eastern Europe was developed, which includes the Republic of Macedonia. The Program presents a list of priority environmental investments, which will certainly be useful in the process of investment planning at the national level. According to the data of the State Statistical Office in the period between 2000 and 2002 following financial amounts in the area of environment protection were invested: Environmental investments 
In thousand denars 
total waste water noise air soil and water flora and fauna 2000 80.048 55.408 7.804 85 7.918 6.796 2.037 2001 91.190 33.030 21.632 30 23.906 8.182 4.410 2002 151.489 60.742 8.722 6.133 4.066 5.331 66.495 Source: State Statistical Office  In the last three years the financial resources of the Fund of Environment and of the MEPP budget have been mainly invested in the following fields: water, air, waste and biological diversity, and the activities of public education and awareness raising have been supported, too.  The following investments are among the most significant: - More than one billion denars from the Budget of the Republic of Macedonia, other funds, funds of the JSC Electric Power Company of Macedonia and resources generated through the sale of JSC Macedonian Telecommunication, have been invested in the development of the Hydro-system for Dojran Lake Salvage; - more than 18.000.000 MKD have been invested in the establishment of river monitoring; - 25.000.000 MKD have been invested in the construction of wastewater treatment plant in Prilep (Studencica); - the MEPP contributed 10 million denars for the setting up of air quality monitoring stations;  - in total 5.000.000 MKD have been allocated for waste removal from illegal dump sites;  - for the purpose of environmental hot spot elimination, as is the case of tailings spill-over from the “Sasa” mine, and for the purpose of the rehabilitation of the Ramina land-slide, 150.000.000 MKD have been invested;  - around 15.000.000 MKD have been invested in biological diversity protection. In the course of the last three years, the MEPP and the Environment Fund have executed investments amounting to 658.702.000,00 MKD, or by years:   2002 - 359.442.000 MKD   2003 - 149.100.000 MKD    2004 – 150.160.000 MKD.  
7. Give a detailed description (with staffing levels) of the administrative bodies (Ministries, agencies etc.) responsible for enacting, implementing and enforcing environmental legislation and policy? How are the responsibilities shared for the various sectors (water, waste, nature protection etc.)? 
According to the Constitution of the Republic of Macedonia(“Official Gazette of RM” No. 52/91) and Amendments to the Constitution of the Republic of Macedonia (Decision for Proclamation of the Amendments to the Constitution of RM, “Official Gazette of RM” No. 52/91, 1/92, 31/98, 91/01,84/03), the Assembly of the Republic of Macedonia as a representative body of the citizens and the institution entrusted with legislative authority in the republic, adopts laws and issues authentic interpretation of laws. For the purpose of performing activities within the scope of its competence, the Assembly also adopts decisions, declarations, resolutions, recommendations and conclusions. The organization and the functioning of the Assembly are regulated by the Constitution and by the Rules of Procedure of the Assembly of the Republic of Macedonia (“Official Gazette of RM” No. 60/02). The Assembly performs other activities stipulated in the Constitution and in the laws, including adoption of strategic and planning documents in the area of the environment, in cases in which it is authorized by law to do so. The Assembly adopts the Spatial Plan of the Republic of Macedonia as the most important document for the development of the Republic of Macedonia.  The Assembly discusses and decides on all laws and documents submitted thereto for adoption or consideration by the President of the Government of the Republic of Macedonia, the Government Representative or upon a proposal submitted by 10 000 citizens.  Discussion on proposals commences at the relevant commissions and bodies established within the Assembly. In the area of the environment, the Commission for Transport, Communications and the Environment has been established as a permanent body. Apart from this Commission, environmental laws, depending on the specific subject of regulation, are considered by the Commission for Agriculture, Forestry and Water Economy and the Commission for Political System and Inter-communities Relations. The ratification of international conventions, agreements and protocols is considered by the Foreign Policy Commission.  According to the Law on Organisation and Operation of the State Administrative Bodies (“Official Gazette of RM” No. 58/00, 44/00), the Ministry of Environment and Physical Planning holds the legal obligation to create and implement environmental policy in the Republic of Macedonia, to lead the activities in the area of the environment and to provide for rational use of space and natural resources.  According to the same law, the Ministry of Environment and Physical Planning (hereinafter: MEPP) performs activities concerning: monitoring of the state of the environment; water, soil, flora, fauna, air and ozone layer protection against pollution; protection against noise and radiation; protection of biological diversity, geological diversity, national parks and protected areas; restoration of polluted segments of the environment; proposed measures for solid waste treatment; spatial planning; spatial information system; supervision within the scope of its competences; and performs other activities stipulated by law. Bodies within the MEPP are: State Environment Inspectorate, Service for Environment and Service for Spatial Information System. The internal organisation of the MEPP is regulated by the Rulebook on Systematisation, covering its constituent bodies, as well. The total number of employees in the Ministry, including staff in the constituent bodies, is 91 full time employees (the status in 2004). Occasionally, the MEPP engages external personnel as well, for the purpose of performing individual activities (35-40 contract based staff).  According to the current setup the Service for Environment, carries out professional activities in the area of the environment. The proposed Draft Law on Environment, the adoption of which is expected by the end of the first quarter of 2005, the Service for Environment will be transformed into the Administration of Environment, as a body within the MEPP, with additional administrative activities under its competence.  The Administration of Environment will perform professional activities in nature protection, in waste, water, air, soil, noise protection and in other environmental areas. It will also regulate the environmental impact assessment (EIA) procedure for projects and the procedure concerning integrated environmental permitting and compliance permitting; it will manage the Cadastre of Environment and the Register of Pollutants and Polluters, including their characteristics. The Administration of Environment will be responsible for the environmental monitoring performance, as well as for permitting procedures and other activities stipulated by law.   Within the Service for Environment the Environmental Laboratory operates that carries out measurements and expert analyses of pollution. Due to the expanded competences of the Administration of Environment, it will need significant strengthening in the future. Under CARDS 2004 Project capacity strengthening of the Administration has been envisaged, including the Laboratory, which is part of the obligations under the European Partnership Action Plan. The Service for Spatial Information System is responsible for carrying out professional activities related to the spatial information system, through GIS processing, analysis and presentation of digital spatial data. The State Environment Inspectorate supervises the implementation of laws and other acts in the area of the environment. The Inspectorate conducts direct supervision of legal entities and natural persons with regard to the enforcement of and compliance with the conditions stipulated in individual permits.  According to the Law on Organisation and Operation of the State Administrative Bodies, other Ministries hold direct or indirect competences in the domain of environmental management. Apart from the MEPP, which has the leading role in the area of the environment, the public administration bodies with direct competences include: the Ministry of Defence performing activities related to civil protection; the Ministry of Interior performing activities related to: the implementation of the system of public security; production of, trade in, storage of and protection against inflammable liquids, gases, explosives and other dangerous materials and transportation of such materials; the provision of aid in cases of natural disasters and epidemics; the Ministry of Economy performing activities related to: geological surveys and exploitation of mineral resources and energy; the Ministry of Agriculture, Forestry and Water Economy performing activities related to: agriculture, forestry and water economy; use of agricultural land, forests and other natural resources; hunting and fishing; livestock and plants protection against diseases and pests; monitoring and studying of water status, maintenance and improvement of water regimes; hydro-melioration systems; study and research of meteorological, hydrological and bio-meteorological phenomena and processes; the Ministry of Health performing activities concerning health protection of the population through air, water, soil and foodstuff pollution monitoring; protection of the population against communicable diseases, harmful impacts of gases, ionising radiation, and noise; hygiene and epidemiologic status; the Ministry of Transport and Communications performing activities related to: inland waterways, housing and public works.  The above described setup indicates the existing fragmentation of competencies among bodies in the domain of environment management, which is partly overcome by the adoption of new environmental laws, providing for higher integration of environmental management. The MEPP has obtained full competence in the domain of water management, while the Ministry of Agriculture, Forestry and Water Economy remains the responsible body in the domains of irrigation, forestry, hunting and fishing. Waste management, nature protection and air quality management have been transferred under the full competence of the MEPP. Environmental monitoring is integrated as full competence of the MEPP, too.  According to the Law on the Local Self-Government (“Official Gazette of RM” No. 5/02), the local self-government units are competent and responsible for regulating and performing activities of public interest of local importance, as stipulated by law. The same Law defines the list of competences of the local self-government units , such as: environment and nature protection – measures for the protection and prevention of water, air and soil pollution, nature protection, protection against noise and non-ionizing radiation; public activities – drinking water supply; technological water supply; wastewater drainage and treatment; storm wastewater drainage and treatment; maintenance of public hygiene; collection, transportation and treatment of municipal solid and industrial waste; removal of damaged cars from public areas; maintenance and use of parks, green areas, forest parks and recreational areas; regulation, maintenance and use of river beds in urbanized parts. In the area of environmental management in the Republic of Macedonia, the number of municipalities that have civil servants responsible directly for performing activities in environmental management is evidently low. Under the new environmental legislation, numerous responsibilities will be delegated to the local self-government units, especially in the domains of waste management, integrated environmental permitting and compliance permitting and inspection supervision. Within these, there are 68 communal inspectors performing supervision at local level. The Draft Law on Environment stipulates the appointment of municipal inspectors for environment that will undertake many responsibilities under the new laws. In the future, it will be necessary to strengthen the capacities of the local self-government units in environmental management. The CARDS 2004 envisages partial strengthening of the capacities of the local self-government units in the domain of integrated environmental permitting and compliance permitting. INSTITUTIONAL RESPONSIBILITY – by individual sectors 
Responsibility in water sector According to the current structure, the competences in the water sector in the Republic of Macedonia are fragmented among several Ministries, bodies and public enterprises. There are cases when the same aspects of water management are divided among several bodies. According to the Law on Organisation and Operation of the State Administrative Bodies and according to the Law on Waters (“Official Gazette of RM” No. 4/98, 19/00), the competent state administrative body for water management (i.e. water economy) is the Ministry of Agriculture, Forestry and Water Economy (MAFWE), i.e. Water Economy Directorate as a body within the MAFWE (staff structure: Director, nine civil engineers with university degree and one employee with secondary school education). The primary responsibility of the Directorate is to plan water economy and to carry out the procedure for the issuance of water management consents and water management permits as instruments for the implementation of the policy in the area of water economy. The MAFWE also performs inspection supervision.  On the other hand, according to the Law on Organisation and Operation of the State Administrative Bodies, the MEPP is responsible for water protection and environmental quality monitoring, including water quality. The Ministry is responsible for water pollution control on the basis of the Law on Environment and Nature Protection and Promotion (“Official Gazette of RM” No. 13/03 consolidated text). Within the MEPP, the Service for Environment , as a constituent body of the Ministry, is responsible mainly for the professional aspects of water protection. In compliance with the above legal grounds, the Ministry of Transport and Communications (MTC) is responsible for the utility infrastructure, covering the issues of wastewater treatment and water supply. The Ministry of Economy has responsibilities with regard to water resources management for the purpose of electricity generation and exploitation of mineral water resources as mineral resources. In accordance with the Law on Organisation and Operation of the State Administrative Bodies, Law on Waters and Law on Safety of Foodstuffs and  Products and Materials in Contact with Foodstuffs (“Official Gazette of RM” No. 54/02), the Ministry of Health, including the National Public Health Institute (NPHI), is responsible for health safety of drinking and bathing water and for the protection of the population against communicable diseases. Within the Ministry of Agriculture, Forestry and Water Economy, the Hydro Meteorological Directorate is in place, which holds, inter alia, the responsibility for water quality monitoring and, in part, of the air quality monitoring.  The need for an integrated approach to water resources management (including the planning of management at the level of river basins, water use, protection of water against pollution, protection against harmful activity of the water, as well as water management facilities and service management) requires the integration of the organizational setup.  According to the Draft Law on Waters (the adoption of which is expected by the end of the first quarter of 2005), differentiation of responsibilities among relevant Ministries is accomplished and a system of coordination and close mutual cooperation is established. The MEPP will be responsible for the overall water management, including river basins management and permitting system, while the Ministry of Agriculture, Forestry and Water Economy will hold responsibility in the domain of irrigation. The Ministry of Health remains responsible for water health safety monitoring.  
Responsibility in air sector: The MEPP is responsible for air pollution monitoring and for the undertaking of measures for air pollution level reduction. The Ministry of Health is responsible for the health aspects of air quality. Within the Ministry of Health, the National Public Health Institute (NPHI) includes 10 regional branches throughout the Republic of Macedonia, measuring air quality in urban areas. Responsibility in waste sector: The MEPP is responsible for waste management at the level of the Republic of Macedonia. The local self-government units are responsible for municipal and inert waste and for industrial non-hazardous waste from the installations subject to B integrated environmental permits. The Ministry is exclusively responsible for hazardous waste. 
Responsibility in the domain of nature protection: The MEPP is fully responsible for the management and supervision in the field of protected areas and protected species. The Ministry of Agriculture, Forestry and Water Economy is responsible for forest management and forest protection, as well as for the regulation of the hunting and fishing field and the plant protection field. According to the Law on Nature Protection (“Official Gazette of RM” No.67/04), national parks will be transformed into National Park Institutions to be responsible for the management of national parks. The administrative supervision over their operations will be performed by the MEPP, while the Administration of Environment will perform professional supervision over their activities. Bodies within the Ministry of Agriculture, Forestry and Water Economy include: Plant Protection Directorate State Forestry and Hunting Inspectorate  
Responsibilities in chemical management The responsibility for chemical management with the MEPP is stipulated in the Draft Law on Environment, which in general terms regulates the handling of chemicals and the manner of their packaging and labelling, and in the Law on Waste Management (“Official Gazette of RM” No. 68/04, 71/04), which regulates the treatment of waste Polychlorinated Biphenyls (PCBs). The Ministry of Health is responsible for the management of toxic substances, regulated in the Law on Poison Production (“Official Gazette of SFRY” No. 18/76) and the Law on Trade in Poisons (“Official Gazette of SFRY” Nos.13/91) and the Rulebook on the manner of destructing poisons and the packaging used to pack poisons and the manner of redrawing poisons from the market (“Official Gazette of SFRY” No. 7/83). The Ministry of Agriculture, Forestry and Water Economy is responsible for pesticides used for plant protection. According to the Programme for Approximation of the National Legislation to the Legislation of the European Union and the European Partnership Action Plan, the Law on Chemicals is envisaged to be drafted at the level of the framework in this area. It will define the competences of different authority in order to establish a unique system of chemical management. 
Responsibilities in the sector of ionising radiation and radiation safety According to the Law on Ionising Radiation Protection and Safety (“Official Gazette of RM” No. 48/02), the MEPP is responsible for supervision over radioactive waste, while the Ministry of Health is responsible for the protection of the population against exposure to ionising radiation. This Law prescribes the establishment of the Radiation Safety Directorate which will integrate the management in this area. 
Responsibilities in the noise control sector According to the current legislation, the MEPP is responsible for noise control outside the working environment, while the Ministry of Labour and Social Policy is responsible for noise control within working premises. According to the Programme for Approximation of the National Legislation to the Legislation of the European Union and the European Partnership Action Plan, the Law on Harmful Noise Prevention is envisaged to be drafted to determine the responsibilities of individual authorities in the Republic of Macedonia. 8. Are there provisions relating to the training of administrative officials in the environmental field? How difficult is it to find suitably qualified personnel? 
The Law on Civil Servants (“Official Gazette of RM” No. 59/00, 112/00, 34/01, 103/01, 43/02, 98/02, 17/03, 40/03, 85/03, 17/04, 69/04) is the framework law in which the issues concerning the training of civil servants are regulated in general terms.  Section III, Rights and Duties of Civil Servants, of the Law on Civil Servants stipulates that each civil servant has a right and duty to improve professionally, i.e. to be trained in accordance with the needs of the employing body (Article 24, paragraph 1). The professional improvement, i.e. the training of civil servants, is carried out on the basis of an annual programme adopted by the employing body upon prior opinion on that programme by the Agency of Civil Servants (Article 24, paragraph 2).   According to the Rulebook on the Systematisation of Jobs in the Ministry of Environment and Physical Planning (MEPP), most organisational units envisage employment of staff with university degree in natural sciences. In the Republic of Macedonia, there are institutions for higher education (faculties and institutes), which produce professionals highly educated in specific fields and this generally satisfies the needs of the MEPP. However, the Ministry faces the problem of the lack of specialised staff in the relevant environmental areas, mainly in the domains of environmental impact assessment, monitoring, integrated pollution prevention and control, climate change, chemicals, etc.  The mentioned needs are partly met through the courses and training carried out within the MEPP, as well as through the activities of international organisations. It is a usual practice that all the projects implemented through the MEPP contain training components in specific thematic areas covered by the scope of the project. In addition, in the last several years the MEPP increasingly applies the “on the job training” principle as a means of staff training. Thus, for example, in the framework of the PHARE SOP 99 and in the course of the drafting of the new environmental laws, the civil servants of the MEPP involved in the drafting of the legislative texts acquired knowledge on the manner and procedure of drafting laws, on the requirements under the relevant Directives, the development of gap analysis, the development of tables of concordance, and were involved in the acquisition of knowledge and exchange of experiences through study visits. The employees of the MEPP participate in training courses organised and carried out by international organisations. Thus, for example, through the Japanese International Cooperation Agency (JICA), civil servants of the MEPP attended few months training courses in specific fields, for example: waste management, monitoring, nature protection, clean technologies, etc. Several training courses have been organised through the Swedish International Development Agency (SIDA) in the fields of waste management and environmental impact assessment. Training intended for environmental inspectors is organized through the Balkan Network for Environmental Legislation Enforcement (BERCEN), as part of the Regional Environmental Reconstruction Programme (REReP).  For the purpose of implementing its obligations, the MEPP needs properly qualified staff to support the activities of private sector to achieve environmental standards. In this context, it is necessary to initiate the strengthening of the capacities of consulting companies and individuals that should support, with their services, private entities to achieve compliance with the obligations deriving from the new environmental legislation.  In the Draft Law on Environment in order to promote environmental education and to ensure its rising to the level of legal obligation, one of the pillars on which the Ministry has based the environment protection and improvement is the education and training of professional staff in the area of environment through provision of the required support to educational and scientific institutions, to expert organisations and civil associations established for the purpose of the promotion of environmental protection and the implementation of educational activities.  9. What are the mechanisms for monitoring compliance with environmental legislation and the state of the environment? 
The Ministry of Environment and Physical Planning (MEPP) is the competent authority with regard to the monitoring of compliance with environmental legislation and of the state of the environment. The State Environment Inspectorate, as a body within the MEPP, is the competent authority for inspection supervision over the enforcement of laws and regulations in the area of the environment. With regard to the activities within the scope of the responsibility of the local self-government units, the inspection supervision over the enforcement of and compliance with the environmental laws and other regulations is performed by authorised inspectors for environment. The number of inspectors in the State Environment Inspectorate on the territory of the Republic of Macedonia is nine, four of whom are responsible for the supervision in the capital while the rest operate in several cities throughout the Republic of Macedonia, with defined priority areas of supervision. In performing inspection supervision, the State Environment Inspectorate works with the Central Laboratory of Environment, operating within the Service for Environment, a body within the MEPP. The Laboratory is equipped with appropriate equipment required for the performance of laboratory analyses and other tests of pollutions and emissions. The number of employees in the Laboratory is 12. In the case of violation of provisions of the laws in the area of the environment, the State/municipal inspector may in accordance with the scope of his/her work by decision order the implementation of certain measures for removal of pollution and its effects; to restrict and temporarily suspend, until the final court decision, the activities of certain entities; to temporarily seize equipment that are sources of pollution; and to undertake other measures to provide for compliance with the conditions specified in the law or in the relevant permit. If the entities fail to act in accordance with the decision, i.e. fail to eliminate reasons for the caused state, the State Inspector will raise misdemeanour or criminal charges before the competent court, and will initiate procedure for withdrawal of obtained permits and authorizations. If, in certain cases, it is necessary to undertake urgent measures, the Inspector may issue oral order for removal of deficiencies. According to the existing legal regulations, appeals submitted against the decisions taken by State Inspectors are settled by the Second Instance Commission for Settling Administrative Matters in the Area of Environment under the Government of the Republic of Macedonia. Administrative dispute against the decision of the second instance body may be initiated before the Supreme Court of the Republic of Macedonia. According to the new laws, appeal against the decision taken by the state inspector and municipal inspector of the local self-government unit , by which administrative measure is imposed, may be submitted to the Minister of Environment and Physical Planning, in eight days after the receipt of the decision. Administrative dispute against the decision taken by the Minister may be initiated before the Supreme Court of the Republic of Macedonia. According to the Draft Law on Environment, the Director of the State Environment Inspectorate and the Mayor of the local self-government unit are obliged to adopt annual programmes for the implementation of regular inspection supervision. Taking into account the process of decentralisation, the Draft Law on Environment contains a separate Chapter to regulate the manner of and the procedure for the implementation of supervision over the operations of the local self-government bodies while implementing their competencies.  The supervision over the operations of the local self-government bodies while performing their activities arising from the laws in the area of environment is carried out by the Ministry of Environment and Physical Planning (MEPP). In performing the supervision, the Ministry monitors the legality of the operations of the local self-government bodies; undertakes measures and activities and raises initiatives related to the implementation of the competencies of the local self-government unit; assesses whether the local self-government bodies perform their competencies in accordance with the procedures and standards specified by law; indicates cases of going beyond the competencies of the local self-government unit and proposes measures for overcoming such situations; gives recommendations regarding the performance of competencies; monitors the timely implementation of regulations; submits initiatives and proposals in cases of non-compliance with the laws and cases of conflict of competencies between bodies of the local self-government units ; monitors the legality of the decisions taken by the Mayor. When, despite indications and the undertaken measures and activities, the bodies of the local self-government unit fail to perform activities as stipulated by law, for which they are responsible and which are within the scope of their competence, their competence will be repealed and the performance of the competence will be taken over by the MEPP for not more than one year after the day of taking over the competence. The MEPP is obliged to inform the Ministry of Local Self-Government and the Ministry of Finance of all the activities undertaken in this context.  In the case of conflict of competencies among the bearers of legislative, executive and judicial branches of power and conflict of competencies between the state administrative bodies and the bodies of the local self-government units, the competent Court is the Constitutional Court of the Republic of Macedonia. The Criminal Code (“Official Gazette of RM” Nos. 37/96, 80/99, 4/02, 43/03, 19/04) in its Chapter 22, Articles 218 to 234, stipulates the following criminal acts against the environment: Pollution of the environment, Contamination of drinking water, Production of harmful substances for livestock or poultry treatment, Unscrupulous delivery of veterinary aid, Communication of infectious diseases to flora and fauna, Contamination of fodder or water intended for livestock, Destruction of crops by use of harmful substances, Usurpation of immovable assets, Forest destruction, Causing forest fires, Illegal hunting, Illegal fishing, Endangerment of the environment and nature by waste substances, Unauthorized acquisition and disposition of nuclear substances, Entry of hazardous substances in the country and Torture of animals. The Law on Nature Protection (“Official Gazette of RM” No. 67/04), stipulates the following types of criminal acts: Extermination of indigenous wild species, Introduction of wild species in nature, Reintroduction of wild species in nature, Illegal taking and use of genetic and biological material, Unauthorized damaging and destruction of speleological structures, Damaging or destruction of mineral and fossil finds. The Draft Law on Waters, stipulates the following types of criminal acts: Unauthorised use of water and Unauthorized extraction of ground water. In general, the amounts of penalty fees for violating the laws are specified in the Law on Misdemeanours (“Official Gazette of RM” No.15/97, 35/97) which stipulates that a fine of less than 1.000 MKD and more than 50.000 MKD may not be imposed on natural persons and with regard to legal entities a fine of less than 10.000 MKD or more than 300.000 MKD may not be imposed. An immediate fine (fine imposed on the spot) of not more than 10.000 MKD may be imposed on natural persons and a fine of not more than 100.000 MKD on legal entities. According to the Law on Environment and Nature Protection and Promotion (“Official Gazette of RM” No.13/03 consolidated text) the amount of penalty fees imposed on legal entities may range between 50.000 and 300.000 MKD, while a fine of 5.000 to 50.000 MKD may be imposed on the responsible person of the legal entity. The amount of penalty fees imposed on natural persons may range between 10.000 and 50.000 MKD. In addition, there is a possibility to impose an immediate fine on natural persons in the amount of 5.000 MKD. Together with the penalty fee for legal entities, the court may also impose a security measure - prohibition of carrying out a given activity within a time period of six months to five years. With regard to the responsible person of the legal entity, in addition to a fine, a security measure - prohibition of carrying out a professional activity, operation or duty may be imposed for a period of three months to one year. An immediate fine (fine imposed on the spot) of 3.000 MKD may be imposed on a citizen for a minor misdemeanour. The fine will be collected on the spot by the inspector for environment who performs supervision over the enforcement of protection measures applicable within the protected natural goods, by an employee of the Ministry of Interior responsible for maintaining public order and peace, a ranger in a national park, or another person authorised to guard the protected natural good. When a citizen fails to pay immediate fine on the spot, the competent inspector will raise misdemeanour charges on the basis of his/her findings or upon a report by an employee of the Ministry of Internal Affairs responsible for maintaining public order and peace, a ranger in a national park, or another person authorised to guard the protected natural good.  
The  Draft Law on Environment stipulates two types of misdemeanours: major and minor misdemeanours. The fine amounts for major misdemeanours range between 200.000 and 300.000 MKD for a legal entity. The fine specified for the responsible person of the legal entity ranges from 30.000 to 50.000 MKD, while the fine for natural persons ranges from 10.000 to 30.000 MKD. Together with the penalty fee for legal entities, in certain cases of misdemeanour, the court may also impose a security measure - prohibition of carrying out a given activity within a period of six months to three years. For natural persons a prohibition of carrying out professional activities within a period between three months and one year may be imposed. The fine for minor misdemeanours ranges between 100.000 and 200.000 MKD for legal entities. A fine in the range from 10.000 to 30.000 MKD may be imposed on the responsible person in the legal entity. A fine in the range between 10.000 and 30.000 MKD may be imposed on natural persons. In addition to a penalty fee for legal entities, for certain misdemeanours, the competent court may impose a security measure - prohibition of carrying out operations within a time period of three months to one year, while for natural persons a prohibition of carrying out a professional activity within a period between three months and six years may be imposed.  
The  Law on Ambient Air Quality (“Official Gazette of RM” No. 67/04) specifies fines for misdemeanours in the range between 100.000 and 300.000 MKD for misdemeanours committed by legal entities, while a fine in the range from 10.000 to 50.000 MKD will be imposed on the responsible person of the legal entity. With regard to certain misdemeanours, the competent court may pronounce a security measure - prohibition of carrying out given operations within a period of six months to three years, in addition to a penalty fee for legal entities, while a prohibition of carrying out a professional activity within a period between three months and one year may be imposed on the responsible person of the legal entity. The amount of the penalty fee for a misdemeanour committed by natural persons ranges from 5.000 to 30.000 MKD. In case of non-compliance with the provisions of the Law a fine between 30.000 and 50.000 MKD will be imposed on the official and responsible person in the Municipality and in the City of Skopje, .  
According to the Law on Nature Protection (“Official Gazette of RM” No. 67/04), the penalty fees for misdemeanours range between 100.000 and 300.000 MKD. A fine between 10.000 and 50.000 MKD may be imposed on the responsible person of the legal entity, and for certain misdemeanours a sentence of imprisonment may be imposed on natural persons. For certain misdemeanours security measures may be imposed: on the responsible person of the legal entity a security measure - prohibition of carrying out duties or operations within the period of six months to one year; and on the legal entity a security measure - prohibition of carrying out duties or operations within the period of six months to one year; on the legal entity a security measure - seizure of objects; and on natural persons a security measure - seizure of objects. The Law also provides the possibility of imposing immediate fines (fines imposed on the spot), i.e. the collection of fines for committed misdemeanours on the spot by inspectors for environment and by an employee of the state administrative body, responsible for the matters of public order and peace. Such a power is also awarded to ranger services responsible for direct protection of protected areas established in accordance with the law.  
According to the Law on Waste Management (“Official Gazette of RM” No. 68/04, 71/04), the amount of fines for the misdemeanours committed by legal entities and natural persons range as follows: from 50.000 to 300.000 MKD – for legal entities, while the amount of the fine for the responsible person of the legal entity ranges between 10.000 and 50.000 MKD. In addition to the fine, for the same misdemeanour a security measure -prohibition of carrying out operations within a period of three months to one year may be imposed. The Law also provides for imposing immediate fines the amount of which ranges between 30.000 and 100.000 MKD for legal entities, depending on the type of misdemeanour and the activity performed. The immediate fine for natural persons ranges from 1.000 to 10.000 MKD. Apart from competent inspectors the right and obligation to impose immediate fines, is also awarded to an employee of the state administrative body responsible for the matters of public order and peace. When a legal entity or a natural person fails to pay the immediate fine on the spot, the competent inspector for the environment or the municipal inspector for the environment will be obliged to raise misdemeanour charges, based on his/her findings or upon a report by an employee of the state administrative body responsible for internal affairs, for maintaining public order and peace, and the ranger in a protected area - national park,. The Law on Waste Management stipulates specific penalties for performers of individual waste management activities, such as: for waste collectors and transporters, the amount of fines for legal entities range from 10.000 to 300.000 MKD; for responsible persons of legal entities from 10.000 to 50.000 MKD, depending on the type of the waste collected or transported. The amount of the fine for responsible persons of legal entities ranges from 10.000 to 50.000 MKD. Security measure – prohibition of carrying out operations within a period of three months to one year may also be imposed on the responsible persons of legal entities. Immediate fines for legal entities range from 5.000 to 100.000 MKD, depending on the type of waste. 
Depending on the type of waste, the fine for waste processors with regard to committed misdemeanours ranges from 150.000 to 300.000 MKD for legal entities. The fines for responsible persons of legal entities range from 10.000 to 50.000 MKD, depending on the type of waste, and a security measure – prohibition of carrying out operations within a period of three to six months will be imposed on these persons. The immediate fine for legal entities processing waste ranges from 5.000 to 100.000 MKD, depending on the type of waste. 
Depending on the type of waste being disposed, the fine for waste disposers with regard to committed misdemeanours ranges from 150.000 to 300.000 MKD for legal entities, while the fine for responsible persons of legal entities ranges from 10.000 to 50.000 and a security measure – prohibition of carrying out operations within a period of three to six months will be imposed on the persons, together with the fine.  Depending on the type of waste disposed, the immediate fine for legal entities disposing waste ranges from 30.000 to 100.000 MKD, while for natural persons the fine ranges from 1.000 MKD to 10.000 MKD. 
The Draft Law on Waters specifies the fines for misdemeanours in the range between 10.000 and 300.000 MKD for legal entities, and the fine for responsible persons of the legal entities ranges from 10.000 to 50.000 MKD. The fine specified for natural persons ranges from 3.000 to 50.000 MKD. According to the Law on Environment and Nature Protection and Promotion, the Ministry of Environment and Physical Planning is responsible for the general obligations concerning air, water, soil, nature, noise and waste monitoring, as well as for defining requests for monitoring, and the types and formats of monitoring data. In other legal regulations, the monitoring of different environmental media is not clearly defined and coordinated between the competent institutions. Many elements of the secondary legislation are based on laws that have undergone several amendments, thus creating different institutional framework.  In order to overcome the above described situation, the Draft Law on Environment stipulates the establishment of national monitoring network to carry out the monitoring of different environmental media on the territory of the Republic of Macedonia, composed of national environmental medium specific networks (hereinafter: national network), established in a manner and under conditions specified in separate laws. The monitoring of individual media and segments of the environment may be performed by accredited legal entities, scientific and professional organisations, authorized by the MEPP in a manner and under conditions specified by the specific law.  The monitoring of immission /quality of individual environmental media and of emission sources through national and local networks, as well as through the self-monitoring by the operators, is performed in accordance with the methodology stipulated by the specific laws. For the purpose of conducting the monitoring of individual environmental media and segments, the local self-government units may establish local monitoring networks. The funds required for the establishment, operation, maintenance and development of the local monitoring network will be provided by the budget of the respective local self-government unit and from other sources, in accordance with the law and the relevant act of the local self-government unit. The Ministry of Environment and Physical Planning may delegate the performance of the monitoring of given medium or segment of the environment covered by the national monitoring network to the local self-government units. Owners or users of installations that are emission sources and pollute one or more environmental media and segments are obliged to perform monitoring of the sources of emission. The monitoring of the sources of emission, as well as of immission, may be conducted by their own services or through accredited scientific and professional organisations and other legal entities that meet the conditions for monitoring performance. They are obliged to monitor, on a regular basis (through measuring emissions or calculating and estimating the quantity of emissions), the emissions from the sources of emissions, to monitor on a regular basis the immissions close to the sources of emissions, as specified by law and in a manner stipulated in the integrated environmental permit. They must monthly report the data from regular emission monitoring at the source of pollution to the Ministry.  The state administrative bodies, the local self-government bodies and the entities that perform self-monitoring must submit the monitoring data to the Ministry of Environment and Physical Planning free of charge. For the purpose of fulfilling the obligations of the Republic of Macedonia undertaken through the ratified international agreements, the Ministry of Environment and Physical Planning reports the data obtained from monitoring and other data related to the environment to the relevant international organisations.  For the purpose of environmental data management, the Ministry has established the Environmental Information System. This information system has been established and organised in order to develop relevant database, i.e. comprehensive, accurate, publicly accessible information on the state and the quality of the environment. The information system incorporates systematisation, storage and use of data collected through the monitoring of individual environmental media and segments. The Ministry of Environment and Physical Planning is obliged to prepare the State of the Environment Report of the Republic of Macedonia every three years. 
10. Please detail the number of prosecutions for breaches of environmental law and the level of penalty for such breaches. Please provide information on the collection rates of fines imposed and the relevant statistics for breaches in the sectors of air, water and waste for the last three years and, if available, also for other environmental sectors. 
The Ministry of Environment and Physical Planning (MEPP) is the competent body for the implementation of the regulations in the area of the environment (for more details see 22_I_ _ _P9).  Within the MEPP, the competent body for the implementation of inspection supervision over the enforcement of environmental regulations is the State Environment Inspectorate. The number of inspectors for environment on the territory of the Republic of Macedonia is nine, four of whom are responsible for the supervision in the capital while the rest operate in several cities throughout the Republic of Macedonia, with defined priority areas of supervision.  In the course of the last three years the State Environment Inspectorate performed the following activities within the scope of its competences and on the basis of the environmental regulations: In 2001-271 conclusions from conducted inspections were prepared (hereinafter: minutes), 81 decisions on the implementation of compulsory measures were taken (hereinafter: decisions), 12 misdemeanour charges were brought before competent courts, of which nine misdemeanour procedures were settled and three are still in procedure.  -  In 2002 - 510 reports with conclusion were prepared, 155 decisions were taken, 27 misdemeanour charges were brought before competent courts, of which 13 misdemeanour procedures were settled and 14 are still in procedure, three criminal charges were brought before competent courts, of which one was settled and two are still in procedure.  -  In 2003 - 1143 reports with conclusion were prepared, 239 decisions were taken, and 69 misdemeanour charges were brought before competent courts, of which 13 were settled and 56 are still in procedure.  The following types of fines and sentences have been passed with regard to committed breaches of environmental regulations: warnings for misdemeanours, fines in the range between 2.000 to 200.000 MKD, and suspended sentences with a safety measure suspension from work for a period of one year for the committed criminal act. The Second Instance Commission under the Government of the Republic of Macedonia responsible for settling matters in the area of transport, communications and environment through administrative procedure, has performed as follows with regard to the appeals submitted against the decisions issued by the first instance bodies: In 2001, of the total of 17 cases submitted, 2 were settled, and 15 transferred for settlement in 2002; In 2002, of the total of 24 new cases submitted, 12 were settled, including those transferred from 2001, and 27 cases were transferred for settlement in 2003; In 2003, the number of new cases submitted was 34, of which 55 were settled, together with previously transferred ones from 2002, and 6 cases were transferred for settlement in 2004; In the period between 2001 and 2003, the status of administrative disputes initiated, under procedure and finalized by the Supreme Court of the Republic of Macedonia against administrative acts in the area of environment, was as follows: in 2001, one administrative case was registered; it was settled and the lawsuit was rejected as invalid; in 2002, five administrative cases were registered, four of which were settled and three were rejected as unfounded, one was rejected as invalid; in 2003, eight cases were registered, only one of them was settled and the lawsuit was rejected as unfounded. With regard to the regulations in the area of communal activities, the State Communal Inspectorate under the Ministry of Transport and Communications has taken in total 31 decisions in the course of the last three years, based on the Law on Waste ("Official Gazette of RM" No. 37/98,16/04 repealed by the Law on Waste Management ("Official Gazette of RM" No. 68/04,71/04) and the Law on Communal Activities ("Official Gazette of RM" No. 45/97,23/99,45/02,16/04). Seven misdemeanour charges were brought against legal entities and responsible persons of legal entities - hazardous waste generators. Communal activities of local importance are carried out by municipal communal inspectors appointed by the mayors of the local self-government units, and there are 68 in the territory of the Republic of Macedonia. The total number of decisions taken in the last three years, on the basis of the Law on Waste ("Official Gazette of RM" No. 37/98,16/04), the Law on Communal Activities ("Official Gazette of RM" No. 45/97, 23/99,45/02,16/04) and Law on Maintenance of Public Cleanliness, Collection and Disposal of Communal Solid and Technological Waste ("Official Gazette of RM" No. 37/98) was 5666, while the number of charges brought for misdemeanours was 1476, of which 60 were rejected as expired; 181 are still in procedure and 1295 have been settled. Fines in the range between 1.000 and 50.000 MKD have been passed for the above committed breaches, as well as misdemeanour warnings.  In the last three years the State Transport Inspectorate under the Ministry of Transport and Communications, acting on the basis of the removal of objects and materials from public roads section of the Law on Public Roads ("Official Gazette of RM" Nos. 26/96, 40/99, 96/00, 29/02, 68/04) took in total 38 decisions, brought 74 charges for misdemeanour, of which 19 were settled and 30 stopped, while 25 are still in procedure.  Fines in the range between 1.000 and 10.000 MKD have been imposed for the above committed breaches.  The State Agriculture Inspectorate under the Ministry of Agriculture, Forestry and Water Economy is the competent body inspection supervision over the implementation of: The Law on Agricultural Land ("Official Gazette of RM" Nos. 25/98,18/99,2/04), the Law on Fisheries ("Official Gazette of RM" No. 62/93), the Law on Quality and Quality Control of Fertilizers  ("Official Gazette of SFRY" Nos. 10/73, 51/88, 20/90 and “Official Gazette of RM” No. 83/92), the Law on Pastures ("Official Gazette of RM" Nos. 3/98, 101/00), the Fire Protection Law ("Official Gazette of SFRY" Nos. 43/86, 37/87, 51/88, 36/90 and “Official Gazette of RM” No 12/93), Law on Waters ("Official Gazette of RM" Nos. 4/98, 19/00), the Law on Plant Protection ("Official Gazette of RM" Nos. 25/98, 6/00).  The total number of conducted controls in 2001 was 1638, on the basis of which 1231 reports with conclusions were produced, 365 decisions taken, 997 charges for misdemeanour brought, 216 of which were settled. In 2002, the total number of conducted controls was 1755, on the basis of which 1519 reports with conclusions were produced, 374 decisions taken, and 331 misdemeanour and 37 criminal charges brought. The number of settled misdemeanour proceedings was 60. In 2003, the total number of conducted controls was 1582, on the basis of which 1431 reports with conclusions were produced, 322 decisions taken, and 516 misdemeanour and 18 criminal charges brought. The number of settled misdemeanour proceedings was 78. The State Forestry and Hunting Inspectorate under the Ministry of Agriculture, Forestry and Water Economy, employing 17 inspectors, is the competent body for inspection supervision over the implementation of: The Law on Forest ("Official Gazette of RM" Nos. 47/97, 7/00, 89/04), the Law on Hunting ("Official Gazette of RM" Nos. 20/96, 26/96, 34/97, 69/04), the Law on Seeds, Seedlings and Propagating Material and Sort Recognition, Approval and Protection ("Official Gazette of RM" Nos. 41/00). In 2002, the State Forestry and Hunting Inspectorate took 407 decisions, brought 344 misdemeanour and 10 criminal charges. The number of decisions taken in 2003 was 487, when 343 misdemeanour and seven criminal charges were brought. 
The total number of criminal charges brought in the last three years was: 

 2001 - 10 criminal procedures were initiated, of which nine were settled and one is still in procedure.  The following sentences have been imposed: suspended sentence was imposed in eight cases and imprisonment in one.   2002 - 41 criminal procedures were initiated, of which 39 were settled and two are still in procedure. The following sentences have been imposed: in one criminal procedure a person was acquitted and suspended sentences were given in 29 criminal procedures, while in eight cases the fines ranging from 6,000 to 10,000 MKD were imposed. One criminal procedure was settled in a different manner.    2003 - 17 criminal procedures were initiated, of which 16 were settled and one is still in procedure. The following sentences have been imposed: suspended sentences were given in 5 criminal procedures, 7 cases were finalized with court warnings, 2 cases were finalized with fines  and two cases with imprisonment. 
The total number of misdemeanours charges submitted to the Courts of first instance on the territory of the Republic of Macedonia, by years, is shown in the table bellow: 

SUMMARY REPORT 
INITIATED PROCEDURES FOR MISDEMEANOUR EXECUTED IN PROCEDURE STOPPED EXPIRED RETREATED REJECTED AREA 200200200200200200200200200.200200200200200200200200200200200200WASTE 219 120 307151 55  1440  12  2725 7  25NATURE 1481  1535 9591091  1161  14319  27  20   AIR 6   0   NOISE 0   WATER 626 764 462393 452  25562  31 63  27  2716 TOTAL  2333  2421  17291637  1669  5427  19  42 110  65  4869  29  2819 Source: data obtained from the courts of first instance in the Republic of Macedonia, and processed by the MEPP 
a) In the area of waste  handling, the following penalties have been imposed: warnings for misdemeanour and fines ranging from 1.000 to 10.000 MKD.  
b) In the area of air, the following penalties have been imposed: one warning for misdemeanour and one fine in an amount of 10.000 MKD.  c) In the area of the infringement of nature related regulations, the following penalties have been imposed: warnings for misdemeanour and fines ranging from 1.500 to 350.000 MKD.  
d) In the area of the infringement of water related regulations, the following penalties have been imposed: warnings for misdemeanour and fines ranging from 1.000 to 10.000 MKD.  
e) In the area of noise, warnings for misdemeanour have been imposed. 
The data included in the answer originate from each inspection authority separately and refer solely to the misdemeanours in the area of environment.  Data referring to courts originate from the records kept by each court separately by areas, i.e. by laws. The data do not specify precisely the types of misdemeanours regulated by laws concerning exclusively misdemeanours against the environment. For this reasons, the data also include misdemeanours reported on the basis of the above mentioned laws, but can also refer to other misdemeanours specified in those laws.  The data was processed by the MEPP.  The rate of penalties collection for executed cases is 59.63 %, as reflected in the data contained in the column on executed procedures of misdemeanours in the above table.  With regard to the relevant statistics of the infringements of environmental regulations, the State Statistical Office possesses data on persons committing criminal acts, but not on the prosecution proceedings. 
11. Are economic instruments (taxes, duties, etc) used for environmental policy? Please estimate the percentage of GDP spent on environmental protection. 
Economic instruments for the policy of environment are regulated in an integrated manner by the Draft Law on Environment, the adoption of which is expected by the end of the first quarter of 2005. The Draft Law is founded, inter alia, on the following principles: The user of natural resources is obliged to compensate for the costs required to provide sustainable development, as well as for the rehabilitation of degraded environmental media and individual areas resulting from the use of natural resources (user pays principle); The polluter is obliged to compensate for the costs for the elimination of the danger for the environment by pollution, to bear the costs for environment rehabilitation and to pay equitable compensation for the damage caused to the environment, as well as to revert the environment, to the maximum extent possible, into the state before the damage occurred (polluter pays principle). With the adoption of the Law on Environment and Nature Protection and Promotion (“Official Gazette of RM” No 13/03 consolidated text), the Environment Fund was established for the first time in the Republic of Macedonia for the purpose of providing funds for environment protection and improvement. The Law stipulates specific fees through which a part of the financial assets of the Fund was generated. The Law has introduced the fees payable at the registration of motor vehicles which are higher for vehicles without catalytic converters (4 %), and lower for vehicles with catalytic converters (2 %).  The Draft Law on Environment, the adoption of which is expected by the end of the first quarter of 2005, will repeal the Environment Fund, and its current activities will continue to be carried out by a sector within the Ministry of Environment and Physical Planning. The above structure has resulted from the recommendations obtained through the cooperation of the Republic of Macedonia with the International Monetary Fund, to repeal the non-vital funds in the Republic of Macedonia, due to the treasury system of operations.  The Draft Law on Environment will introduce fees to be used as sources of funds for the implementation of measures and activities aimed directly at environment and nature protection and improvement.  The following categories of fees have been envisaged: 
Import and export fees: import of protected or used tires; import of used refrigerators, deep freezers, other cooling and freezing appliances; export of plants and their parts, branches and other parts of plants; import of ozone depleting substances classified in the Annexes to the Montreal Protocol; import of wastes and lead containing residues; ashes and lead containing residues; wastes and residues from used primary cells, primary car and other electrical batteries and wastes and residues containing lead; export of shelled and non shelled molluscs ; import of used vehicles; import of used tape recorders and other sound recording devices, television receivers, video monitors, video projectors. 
Motor vehicles and vessels fees: payable at the registration of motor vehicles and vessels, without catalytic converters (4 %), and with catalytic converters (2 %). 
Fees for the use of natural resource – water: for the use of water by water supply systems and the use of water for electricity production; for water bottling for commercial purposes; for water use for heat energy generation from geothermal water resources; for the use of water for fish breeding on fish farms.  
Fees for the protection of water resources against wastewater discharges. 

Fees for use of natural resource – mineral resources: sand, stone and gravel extraction, washing and separation; use of mineral resources for construction and decorative stone, marble, granite onyx, etc.  
Fees for the use of the environment paid by all employees in the amount of 0,20 % of the salary base for the calculation of a personal tax. 
Wood cutting fee. 

Waste management fee: for the generation of industrial non-hazardous waste; for the generation of residues from crude oil or oils and waste oils. 
Cigarettes fee. 

Oil derivates fees. 

Plastics and plastic products fees: 
Revenues generated on the basis of the above fees are revenues of the Budget of the Republic of Macedonia. The following legal entities and natural persons are subject to payment of the above fees: those possessing the sources of environment pollution; those who pollute the environment through the use of products and substances; those who are users of natural resources; those who burden the environment with waste; those who import used products in the Republic of Macedonia, and those who produce or import products and goods which are environmentally harmful or contain substances harmful to the environment. The following will be exempted from the payment of fees:  - legal entities and natural persons up to the fee that would be paid for the quantity and type of the waste transferred to legal entities and natural persons with permits for waste processing ; - legal entities and natural persons that have established the system of collection and receipt upon return of used products and packaging up to the fee that would be paid for the quantity of the used products and packaging returned thereby; - legal entities and natural persons that have exported waste from the Republic of Macedonia up to the fee that would be paid for the quantity and type of waste exported which is subject of the fee payment; - legal entities and natural persons that have exported packaging of plastic mass or products in plastic packaging, up to the fee that would be paid for the quantity and type of the packaging made of plastic mass;  - legal entities and natural persons that have conducted environmental investments for the purpose of implementation of operational plans required under the compliance permits, will be exempted from the payment of a part of the fee paid in the preceding year; The funds collected through the above fees will be used in accordance with the annual program for environmental investments, as stipulated in the Draft Law on Environment. The Programme is developed in accordance with the National Environmental Action Plan (NEAP) of the Republic of Macedonia, the Spatial Plan of the Republic of Macedonia, other strategies, programmes and acts in the area of environment, as well as international agreements ratified by the Republic of Macedonia. The Programme is adopted by the Government of the Republic of Macedonia, upon the proposal of the MEPP.  The funds of the Programme are used to finance the preparation and development of programmes, projects and other similar activities, as well as to cover the undertaking of preventive measures and measures aimed at the environment preservation, sustainable use, protection and improvement, and particularly at: protection, preservation and improvement of the quality of air, soil, water; water use, wastewater and storm water drainage and treatment;  climate change mitigation: ozone layer protection, protection against radiation, GHG emissions abatement; rehabilitation and construction of landfills; encouragement of waste generation minimization, waste treatment and selection; conservation and improvement of biological diversity; protection of human health against pollution and promotion thereof; encouragement of Cleaner Production; improvement of the state of environment monitoring and assessment and introduction of environmental management systems; encouragement of sustainable use of natural goods;  encouragement of sustainable development of rural areas; encouragement of achievement of environmental standards in economic activities, i.e. sustainable economic development; encouragement of educational, research and development studies, programmes, projects and other activities; supporting non-governmental and non-for-profit organisations in the area of environment; supporting development of Local Environmental Action Plans. The allocation of the funds of the Programme is carried out by way of public competitions. In addition to the provisions contained in this Law, there are certain economic instruments specified in other laws, related to, above all, the use of natural resources and public service provision in the field of waste management.  Activities related to economic instruments are envisaged in the process of development of the second NEAP (National Environmental Action Plan), which will give recommendations with regard to the future upgrading of economic instruments. Within CARDS 2004, part of the planned activities will focus on the institutional integration of the use of economic instruments, including capacity building within the MEPP with regard to the management of such instruments.  Specific instruments as taxes and customs duties used to support the policy of environment protection are regulated in the following manner:  
a)  personal income tax 
In accordance with Article 6, paragraph 6, item 21- of the Personal Income Tax Law ("Official Gazette of RM" Nos. 80/93, 3/94, 70/94, 71/96, 28/97, 8/01, 50/01, 52/01, 2/02, 44/02, 96/04), the income through sale of usable solid waste acquired by a natural person is not subject to taxation. b) profit tax 
In accordance with Article 35 of the Profit Tax Law ("Official Gazette of RM" Nos. 80/93; 33/95, 43/95, 71/96, 5/98, 28/98, 11/01, 2/02, 44/02, 51/03), the tax base of the taxpayer will be reduced up to the level of funds invested in environment and nature protection. According to Article 30 of the Profit Tax Law, the taxpayer is entitled to accelerated fixed assets depreciation in cases of achievement of technological modernisation or procurement of environment and nature protection preparations, up to the level which exceeds by 25 % the depreciation calculated by one of the methods for depreciation calculation. According to Article 4, paragraph 1, item 18 of the Rulebook on the manner of calculation and payment of profit tax and prevention of double tax relief or double taxation ("Official Gazette of RM" Nos. 92/02, 54/03 and 56/03), resources serving environment and nature protection include resources intended for equipment, devices and instruments used for pollution reduction and for measurement of the status of air, water and soil pollution, introduction of clean technologies, as well as for the construction of municipal and industrial wastewater treatment plants, instalment of filters for protection of air against pollution, manufacturing of products from waste materials, collection and disposal of communal and hazardous substances, etc.  
c) excise duty 
Higher excise duty is prescribed for petrol with lead content above 0.013 g/l (24.396 MKD / litre), compared to the excise duty prescribed for unleaded petrol with lead content below 0.013 g/l (21.692 MKD/litre) and for diesel fuel (12.121 MKD/litre). 
d) customs duties 
In accordance with Article 183, line 7 of the Customs Administration Law ("Official Gazette of RM" Nos. 21/98, 26/98, 63/98, 86/99, 25/00, 109/00, 31/01, 4/02, 55/02, 42/03), all objects intended for direct environment and nature protection, provided they are not produced in the Republic of Macedonia, will be released from customs duties payment. The Law on Customs Tariff ("Official Gazette of RM" Nos.23/03, 69/04) determines higher customs rates for goods that burden the environment in the course of their use: used tires, used cars, road truck-tractors, busses and trucks. The National Budget of the Republic of Macedonia is an important economic instrument for the environment protection policy. Namely, Article 3 of the Draft Law on Environment stipulates that measures and activities intended for environment and nature protection and improvement are of public interest. According to the same Article, the State is obliged to provide the resources required for environment and nature protection and improvement. The state provides such resources mainly through allocation of funds to the budget of the MEPP, amounting 0.51 % of the total National Budget in 2003.  It is not possible to determine precisely the percentage of the GDP related to environment protection, due to the fact that investments in environmental protection are carried out on various bases and by various entities (private sector, NGOs, local self-government units, donors, Budget of the Republic of Macedonia, etc.). According to the data available in the MEPP, the percentage of the GDP related to environment protection is approximately 0.25 %.  12. Are there any mechanisms to provide for the protection of the environment to be taken into consideration in other policies, in particular agricultural, industrial, energy and transport policies in line with Article 6 of the EC treaty? 
The achievement of sustainability at the level of national development requires strategic approach, as well as long-term perspective and integration of different development processes within which solutions for complex challenges are offered. Sustainable development requires changes in the policies of many sectors, but it also requires coherence among them. This assumes the balancing of economic, social and environmental goals and their integration whenever it is possible, through the establishment of mutually supportive policies and practices. In this context, the process of development and adoption of documents, such as strategies, national programmes and plans in individual sectors should incorporate the concept of sustainable development, while the policy in the field of the environment should endeavour towards long-term conservation and improvement of the environment. The establishment of mechanisms through which the protection of the environment is taken into account while creating other policies is of particular importance. The establishment of the Ministry of Environment and Physical Planning (MEPP) in 1999 followed the recognition of the commitment of the Government of the Republic of Macedonia to integrate the policy of environmental protection as an indispensable part of social living. This act provided the grounds for appropriate involvement of this sector in the overall development processes in the country, aimed at the establishment of the concept of sustainable development on national level.  There are mechanisms in the Republic of Macedonia that provide for the integration of environmental protection into other sectors’ policies. Thus, for example, the process of drawing up legislation and strategic documents in different sectors is carried out through the establishment of working groups involving, among others, the representatives of relevant state administrative bodies, including representatives of the sector of the environment. In this way, the incorporation of the policy of environment protection in those processes is ensured.  The integration of environmental protection is also regulated in the Rules of Procedure of the Assembly of the Republic of Macedonia ("Official Gazette of RM" No.60/02). Namely, Chapter VII - Working bodies of the Assembly, defines the obligations of permanent and interim working bodies. This mechanism provides that working bodies review at their sessions the proposals submitted by the Government of the Republic of Macedonia in the presence of a representative of the Government. Working bodies may propose amendments and adopt conclusions with regard to them on the basis of the review of submitted proposals.  In addition to this, according to the Rules of Procedure of the Government of the Republic of Macedonia (“Official Gazette of RM“ No. 38/01, 98/02, 9/03, 47/03, 67/03), documents in the area of the environment and sustainable development undergo compulsory review by the relevant Economic System and Current Economic Policy Commission of the Government of the Republic of Macedonia. Article 68 of the Rules of Procedure also stipulates the obligation for cooperation among Ministries and state administrative bodies while elaborating relevant documents. The materials submitted to the Government of the Republic of Macedonia for consideration and adoption, when related to the environment and physical planning, should be accompanied by the opinion of the MEPP.  On the other hand, the Government forwards the materials related to the environment and physical planning to the relevant competent institutions and interested state administrative bodies, requesting their opinion on such materials. While considering certain items within its competence, the Government may, by means of decision, establish interim (ad hoc) bodies. The act for establishment defines their tasks, manner of work and composition. These bodies make decisions mainly in the framework of certain activities carried out in the sector of the environment, and are composed of representatives of sectors that may have significantly impact the environment, i.e. degrade the environment (e.g.: agriculture, forestry, industry, energy, transport, etc.). The Draft Law on Environment, the adoption of which is expected by the end of the first quarter of 2005, in its Chapter X regulates the procedure of impact assessment with regard to the strategies, programmes and plans on the environment, the so called strategic environmental assessment. According to the Draft Law, planning documents that must be subjected to strategic assessment fall into to the following areas: agriculture, forestry, fishery, energy, industry, mining, transport, regional development, telecommunications, waste management, water management, tourism, spatial and urban planning and land use, as well as the National Environmental Action Plan (NEAP) and Local Environmental Action Plans (LEAPs) (for more details see 22_II_A_ _P7).  According to Article 69 of the Draft Law on Environment, the Ministry of Environment and Physical Planning prescribes the manner of information dissemination and public participation in the processes of the adoption of plans and legal acts. The said manner is regulated through by-law issued by the Minister of Environment and Physical Planning. The Ministry of Environment and Physical Planning and other bodies affected by the implementation of planning documents, legal entities and natural persons as well as the public may express their opinion on the draft planning document and report on the environment, to the body drafting the planning document within 30 days after the submission or dissemination of information thereon. This mechanism enables public participation in the process of drawing up strategic development documents. The incorporation of the environmental protection policy in the processes of the creation of sectoral policies is to a certain extent evident in the analysis of the drawn-up strategic development documents. Documents that have incorporated the said mechanisms in the course of their development and implementation are listed below: National Environmental Action Plan (NEAP 1) (1996) The process of integration of the environment into other sectors is one of the main principles on which the development of the NEAP 1 was founded. In the process of definition of priority activities in the area of environment protection, conditions existing in certain sectors and their interaction with the environment were taken into account. This has resulted in the establishment of grounds for inter-sectoral cooperation in the process of environment protection and foundations of sustainability of the development at the national level. The NEAP 1 was developed through cooperation of all relevant stakeholders who had jointly defined and proposed measures for environment protection by individual thematic areas. Recognizing the positive effects of the established mechanism of inter-sectoral cooperation, the same mechanism has been applied in the development of the second NEAP, expected to be adopted by the end of 2005.  National Environmental Health Action Plan (NEHAP 1) (1999) This document, the development of which involved representatives of the Ministry of Environment and Physical Planning (MEPP), recognises the linkage between the environment and health. Namely, it formulates guidelines aimed at overcoming environmental health problems, and identifies priorities and actions that treat, among other issues, institutional setup, stressing the need for the establishment of inter-sectoral cooperation, reform of environmental health services and capacity building, information systems strengthening, development of criteria and procedures for the assessment of environmental impacts on human health and their integration in decision making processes, establishment of control measures, updating and modernisation of the system of environmental-health risks assessment. 
- Spatial Plan of the Republic of Macedonia (2004) 
The Spatial Plan of the Republic of Macedonia, which has a stressed strategic development orientation, defines and specifies the main and feasible goals and directions of development. In terms of the necessary qualitative and quantitative structural changes, it defines relevant and adaptable spatial planning solutions and options.  The document specifies the goals and the planning determinants of the environment protection and improvement, as part of the overall activities in the field of spatial planning. Based on the relevant scientific data on the state of the environment and nature, areas and sites of degraded quality of the environment are identified, on the basis of which the goals and the planning determinants are defined, thus establishing the concept of their protection.  The Spatial Plan of the Republic of Macedonia is implemented through the development of spatial plans for regions, municipalities and areas of public interest. To this end, the Law on Implementation of the Spatial Plan of the Republic of Macedonia was adopted ("Official Gazette of RM" No. 39/04). 
- Strategy for Energy Efficiency in Macedonia by 2020 (2004) 
In October 2004, the Ministry of Economy promoted the Strategy for Energy Efficiency in the Republic of Macedonia by 2020, which defines the possibilities for efficient energy use, as well as the guidelines for the energy efficiency policy. The goal of the Strategy, which incorporates the Implementation Plan with specific measures and activities, is to develop a framework for the adoption of energy efficient practices. Generally, this means the promotion of the use of renewable energy sources, through the implementation of training programmes and initiatives and private sector support, in order to reduce the impacts of the energy sector on the environment.  
- Strategy and Action Plan for Biological Diversity Protection in the Republic of Macedonia (2004) 
The Strategy for Biological Diversity Protection and Action Plan was adopted by the Government of the Republic of Macedonia in 2004. It was developed with the financial support provided by the GEF through the World Bank. The Ministry of Environment and Physical Planning (MEPP) coordinated the process of its development. The Strategy and Action Plan contain the most relevant mechanisms with regard to the protection, conservation and sustainable use of wild plant, fungi and animal species in the period until 2008. Under the Strategy, the analysis has been made and measures, actions and mechanisms for cooperation among sectors have been defined for the purpose of biological diversity protection. The Action Plan contains tasks with estimated costs, time frames and expected outcomes.  
- Strategy for Agriculture Development by 2005 (2001) 
The Strategy was developed through cooperation between the Macedonian Academy of Science and Arts and the Ministry of Agriculture, Forestry and Water Economy (MAFWE). The Strategy, in its Introduction, states that one of its main objectives is to achieve rational use of human and natural resources for the purpose of reducing environmental pollution caused by the agricultural sector. However, it does not envisage/define mechanisms, measures and activities through which the set objective will be attained.  
13. Which international agreements concerning environmental protection have been signed and which ones have been ratified? 
The Republic of Macedonia takes an active part in international efforts aimed at solving the global environment pollution and degradation and has achieved significant progress in the international cooperation in the area of the environment, on bilateral, regional, European and global levels. In this context, the Republic of Macedonia is a signatory to a high number of multilateral environmental agreements, which are of great importance to the Republic of Macedonia in terms of its participation and influence in the Region and in Europe.  
GENERAL Ratified: 

Convention on Environmental Impact Assessment in a Transboundary Context (Espoo, February 1991) The Convention was ratified by means of the Law on Ratification (“Official Gazette of RM” No. 44/99). 
Convention on Access to Information, Public Participation in Decision-Making and Access to Justice in Environmental Matters (Aarhus Convention) The Convention was ratified by means of the Law on Ratification (“Official Gazette of RM” No. 40/99). 
Energy Charter Protocol on Energy Efficiency and Related Environmental Aspects The Protocol was ratified by means of the Law on Ratification of the final document of the European Conference on Energy Charter (“Official Gazette of RM” No. 16/98). 
Signed: 

Protocol on Strategic Environmental Assessment The Protocol has been adopted on the basis of the Espoo Convention. The Republic of Macedonia signed it in May 2003, in Kiev, Ukraine, at the Fifth Ministerial Conference “Environment for Europe”.  
Protocol on Pollutant Release and Transfer Registers The Protocol has been adopted on the basis of the Aarhus Convention. The Republic of Macedonia signed it in May 2003, in Kiev, Ukraine, at the Fifth Ministerial Conference “Environment for Europe”.  
NATURE 
Ratified: 

Convention on Biological Diversity (Rio) The Convention was ratified by means of the Law on Ratification (“Official Gazette of RM” No. 54/97). The Convention entered into force in 1998.  
Convention on Wetlands of International Importance especially as Waterfowl Habitats (Ramsar) The Convention has been ratified by means of the Decree on Ratification (“Official Gazette of the SFRY” No. 9/77). 
Convention on the Conservation of Migratory Species of Wild Animals (Bonn) The Convention was ratified by means of the Law on Ratification (“Official Gazette of RM” No. 38/99). The Convention entered into force in November 1999.  
Convention on the Conservation of European Wildlife and Natural Habitats (Bern) The Convention was ratified by means of the Law on Ratification (“Official Gazette of RM” No. 49/97). The Convention entered into force in April 1999.  
Convention for the protection of the World Cultural and Natural Heritage The Convention was ratified by the Socialist Federal Republic of Yugoslavia in 1977, published in the “Official Gazette of SFRY” No. 56/74. The Republic of Macedonia has taken it over by means of succession and became Party to the Convention on 08.09.1991.  
Convention on International Trade in Endangered Species of Wild Fauna and Flora (Washington) The Convention was ratified by means of the Law on Ratification (“Official Gazette of RM” No. 82/99). The Republic of Macedonia became Party to the Convention on 02.11.2000. 
European Convention for the Protection of Vertebrate Animals Used for Experimental and other Scientific Purposes 
The Convention was ratified by means of the Law on Ratification (“Official Gazette of RM” No. 13/02).  
Protocol of Amendment to the European Convention for the Protection of Vertebrate Animals Used for Experimental and other Scientific Purposes 
The Protocol was ratified by means of the Law on Ratification (“Official Gazette of RM” No. 13/02).  
European Landscape Convention (Firenza, 2000) 
The Convention was ratified by means of the Law on Ratification (“Official Gazette of RM” No. 44/03).  
Agreement on the Conservation of Bats in Europe (London, 1991) 
The Agreement was ratified by means of the Law on Ratification (“Official Gazette of RM” No. 38/99), and entered into force in the Republic of Macedonia on 10.09.1999. 
Amendment of the Agreement on the Conservation of Bats in Europe 
The Amendment was ratified by means of the Law on Ratification (“Official Gazette of RM” No.13/02).  
Agreement on the Conservation of African-Eurasian Migratory Waterbirds (the Hague) 
The Agreement was ratified by means of the Law on Ratification (“Official Gazette of RM” No. 32/99), and entered into force in the Republic of Macedonia on 01.11.1999. 
Signed: 

Cartagena Protocol on Biosafety to the Convention on Biological Diversity (Cartagena Protocol) 
The Republic of Macedonia signed the Protocol on 26.07.2000. The Protocol ratification procedure is in progress.  
Memorandum of Understanding on the Conservation and Management of the Middle-European Population of the Great Bustard (Otis tarda) 
The Republic of Macedonia signed the Memorandum on 07.11.2000 in Amman, Jordan. 
ATMOSPHERE 
Ratified: 

Vienna Convention for the Protection of the Ozone Layer (Vienna, March 1985) The Convention was ratified by means of the Law on Ratification “Official Gazette of SFRY” No. 1/90). The Republic of Macedonia has taken it over by means of succession on 10.03.1994.  
Montreal Protocol on Substances that Deplete the Ozone Layer (Montreal, September 1987) 
The Protocol was ratified by means of the Law on Ratification “Official Gazette of SFRY” No. 16/90). The Republic of Macedonia has taken it over by means of succession on 10.03.1994. 
The Amendment to the Montreal Protocol on Substances that Deplete the Ozone Layer – London 
The Protocol was ratified by means of the Law on Ratification (“Official Gazette of RM” No. 25/98).  

The Amendment to the Montreal Protocol on Substances that Deplete the Ozone Layer – Copenhagen 
The Protocol was ratified by means of the Law on Ratification (“Official Gazette of RM” No. 25/98).  
The Amendment to the Montreal Protocol on Substances that Deplete the Ozone Layer – Montreal 
The Protocol was ratified by means of the Law on Ratification (“Official Gazette of RM” No. 51/99). 

The Amendment to the Montreal Protocol on Substances that Deplete the Ozone Layer – Beijing, 1991 
The Protocol was ratified by means of the Law on Ratification (“Official Gazette of RM” No. 13/02). 

United Nations Framework Convention on Climate Change (New York, 1992) 
The Convention was ratified by means of the Law on Ratification (“Official Gazette of RM” No. 61/97), and entered into force in the Republic of Macedonia on 28.04.1998. 
Kyoto Protocol to the United Nations Framework Convention on Climate Change The Protocol was ratified by means of the Law on Ratification (“Official Gazette of RM” No. 49/04). 

Convention on Long-Range Transboundary Air Pollution (Geneva, 1979) The Convention was ratified by means of the Law on Ratification (“Official Gazette of the SFRY” No. 11/86). The Convention was taken over by the Republic of Macedonia by means of succession on 17.11.1991.  
Protocol to the 1979 Convention on Long-Range Transboundary Air Pollution on Long-Term Financing of the Co-operative Programme for Monitoring and Evaluation of the Long-Range Transmission of Air Pollutants in Europe (EMEP, Geneva 1984) The Protocol was ratified by the Socialist Federal Republic of Yugoslavia (“Official Gazette of SFRY” No.2/87), and the Republic of Macedonia has taken it over by means of succession.   
Stockholm Convention on Persistent Organic Pollutants The Republic of Macedonia signed the Convention in Stockholm, Sweden, on 22.05.2001. The Convention was ratified by means of the Law on Ratification (“Official Gazette of RM” No. 17/04) 
Signed: 

Protocol to the 1979 Convention on Long-Range Transboundary Air Pollution on Persistent Organic Pollutants (POPs) The Republic of Macedonia acceded to this Protocol by means of statement (Aarhus, June 1998). It has not ratified it yet.  
Protocol to the 1979 Convention on Long-Range Transboundary Air Pollution on Heavy Metals The Republic of Macedonia acceded to this Protocol by means of statement (Aarhus, June 1998). It has not ratified it yet.  
WASTE 
Ratified: 

Basel Convention on the Control of Transboundary Movements of Hazardous Wastes and Their Disposal The Convention was ratified by means of the Law on Ratification (“Official Gazette of RM” No. 49/97).  
Amendment to the Basel Convention on the Control of Transboundary Movements of Hazardous Wastes and Their Disposal, Amendment to Annex I, Annex VIII and Annex IX (Kitchen, Malaysia, 23-27 February 1998)  Amendments were ratified by means of the Law on Ratification (“Official Gazette of RM” No. 49/04).  
SOIL 
Ratified: 

United Nations Convention to Combat Desertification in Countries Experiencing Serious Drought and/or Desertification, Particularly in Africa 
The Convention was ratified by means of the Law on Ratification (“Official Gazette of RM” No. 13/02), and entered into force in the Republic of Macedonia on 06.06.2002.  
NUCLEAR SAFETY 
Ratified: 

1986 Convention on Early Notification of a Nuclear Accident The Convention was ratified by means of the Law on Ratification and published in the “Official Gazette of SFRY” No. 15/89. The Convention was accepted on 20.09.1996 by means of succession, and entered into force on 17.11.1991. 
1979 Convention on the Physical Protection of Nuclear Material The Convention was ratified by means of the Law on Ratification, and published in the “Official Gazette of SFRY” No. 9/85. The Convention was accepted on 20.09.1996 by means of succession, and entered into force on 17.11.1991. 
Convention on Assistance in the Case of a Nuclear Accident or Radiological Emergency The Convention was ratified by means of the Law on Ratification, and published in the “Official Gazette of SFRY” No. 4/91. The Convention was accepted on 20.09.1996 by means of succession, and entered into force on 17.11.1991. 
Vienna Convention on Civil Liability for Nuclear Damage The Convention was ratified by means of the Law on Ratification, and published in the “Official Gazette of SFRY” No. 5/77. The Convention was accepted on 08.04.1994 by means of succession, and entered into force on 08.09.1991. 
Treaty on the Non-Proliferation of Nuclear Weapons The Treaty was ratified by means of the Law on Ratification, and published in the “Official Gazette of SFRY” No. 10/70. The Treaty was accepted on 30.03.1995 by means of succession, and entered into force on 17.11.1991. 

Agreement for the Application of Safeguards in Connection with the Treaty on the Non-Proliferation of Nuclear Weapons The Agreement was ratified on 23.01.2002, and published in the “Official Gazette of RM” No. 13/02, and entered into force on 16.04.2002. Together with the Agreement, the Small Quantities Protocol was signed, as a Protocol signed by all countries that do not possess nuclear weapons.  
Comprehensive Nuclear-Test-Ban Treaty  The Treaty was ratified by means of the Law on Ratification (“Official Gazette of RM” No.7/00). 

Statute of the International Atomic Energy Agency (IAEA) The Statute was published in the “Official Gazette of SFRY” No. 1/58. The Statute was accepted in February 1994 by means of succession, and entered into force on 17.09.1991.   1957 European Agreement Concerning International Carriage of Dangerous Goods by Road  The Agreement was ratified by means of the Law on Ratification, and published in the “Official Gazette of SFRY” No. 59/72. The Agreement was accepted by means of succession, and entered into force on 17.11.1991. 
TRILATERAL AGREEMENTS 
Signed: 
Declaration on the creation of the Prespa Park and the Environmental Protection and Sustainable Development of the Prespa Lakes and their Surrounding This Declaration was signed by the Prime Ministers of Macedonia, Greece and Albania, respectively, on 02.02.2000, in Germanos, Greece.  
BILATERAL AGREEMENTS 
Ratified: 
Agreement between the Government of the Republic of Macedonia and the Government of the Republic of Croatia on Cooperation in the Field of Environmental and Nature Protection (Zagreb, 2002) The Agreement was signed on 01.03.2002 in Zagreb, Republic of Croatia.  The Agreement was ratified by means of the Law on Ratification (“Official Gazette of RM” No. 13/03). 
Agreement on Cooperation in the Field of Environmental and Nature Protection between the Government of the Republic of Macedonia and the Government of the Russian Federation (Moscow, 1998) The Agreement was signed on 27.01.1998 in Moscow, Russian Federation.  The Agreement was ratified by means of the Law on Ratification (“Official Gazette of RM” No. 16/98). 
Agreement between the Government of the Republic of Macedonia and the Government of the Federal Republic of Yugoslavia on Cooperation in the Field of Environment (Belgrade, 2002) The Agreement was signed on 19.07.2002 in Belgrade, Federal Republic of Yugoslavia.  The Agreement was ratified by means of the Law on Ratification (“Official Gazette of RM” No. 13/03). Signed: 
Agreement between the Ministry of Environment of the Republic of Macedonia and the Ministry of the Environment and Waters of the Republic of Bulgaria on Cooperation in the Field of Environmental Protection (Sofia, 2000) The Agreement was signed on 09.06.2000 in Sofia, Republic of Bulgaria.  The Agreement was not ratified, as it was concluded between ministries. 

Memorandum of understanding concerning Cooperation in the Field of Environmental Protection and Sustainable Development between the Macedonian Ministry of Environment and Physical Planning and the Albanian Environmental Agency (Pogradec, Albania, 2000) The Memorandum was signed on 07.09.2000 in Pogradec, Republic of Albania.  The Memorandum was not ratified, as it was concluded between the ministry and agency. 

Memorandum of understanding and cooperation in sustainable development and the environment between Macedonia and Greece, i.e. Memorandum of understanding and cooperation in sustainable development and the environment between the Party of the Second Part to the New York Interim Accord, of September 13, 1995 and The Party of the First Part to the above Interim Accord (Skopje, 2000) Memorandum was signed on 04.09.2000, in Skopje, Republic of Macedonia. The Memorandum was not ratified, as it was concluded between ministries. 


Letter of Intent between Republic of Macedonia and Province of Low Austria on Establishment of Friendship and Cooperation in the Field of Environmental Protection (St. Pelten, 2000) The Letter of Intent was signed on 06.11.2000, in St. Pelten, Republic of Austria. 
Agreement between the Government of Switzerland represented by the Swiss Agency for Development and Cooperation and the Macedonian Government represented by the Ministry of Environment and Physical Planning concerning the River Monitoring System in Macedonia The Agreement was signed on 16.02.2001, in Skopje, Republic of Macedonia. 
Agreement between the Government of the Republic of Macedonia and the Council of Ministers of the Republic of Albania for the Protection and Sustainable Development of Lake Ohrid and its Watershed The Agreement was signed on 17.06.2004, in Skopje, Republic of Macedonia. 
Protocol on Cooperation in the field of Environmental Protection between the Ministry of Environment and Physical Planning of the Republic of Macedonia and Ministry of Environment of the Czech Republic The Protocol was signed on 17.06.2004 in Prague, Czech Republic. 
Memorandum of Understanding on the Conservation of the European Vultures: Black Vulture (Aegypius monachus); Bearded Vulture (Gypaetus barbatus); Griffon Vulture ( Gyps fulvus) and Egyptian Vulture (Neophron percnopterus) between Ministry of Environment and Physical Planning of the Republic of Macedonia and The Consortium of NGOs consisting of Frankfurt Zoological Society (FZS); Black Vulture Conservation Foundation (BVCF); Foundation for Conservation of Bearded Vulture (FCBV); BirdLife International (BirdLife); Royal Society for Protection of Birds/BirdLife in United Kingdom (RSPB) and Ligue pour la Protection des Oiseaux/BirdLife in France (LPO) The Memorandum was signed on 17.06.2003, in Skopje, Republic of Macedonia. 14. Has your country submitted a report to the Committee on Sustainable Development (CSD) on the implementation of Agenda 21? 
The Republic f Macedonia has submitted reports to the Commission on Sustainable Development (CSD) and they are available on the following WebSites: www.johannesburgsummit.org, www.un.org/esa/sustdev/csd/csd, www.moe.gov.mk/sustainable.  The Republic of Macedonia participated at the 9 Session of the CSD (held in New York, 2001) with separate reports by subject areas of the Session: energy, transport and atmosphere. In 2002, the Government of the Republic of Macedonia adopted the National Assessment Report on Sustainable Development intended for the World Summit on Sustainable Development (WSSD), held in Johannesburg, 2002 and submitted it to the CSD. The National Assessment Report on Sustainable Development was developed in accordance with the Guidelines for NCSD Rio + 10 Assessment, Earth Council. The Ministry of Environment and Physical Planning (MEPP) coordinated the process of its development. With regard to its preparation, the Government of the Republic of Macedonia adopted Decision for establishment of National Preparatory Committee (NPC) and Coordinative Body (CB). The NPC was composed of representatives of all relevant Ministries and other state administrative bodies, including the sectors of science and education, the representatives of the local self-government through the Association of local self-government units, the Chamber of Commerce, the sector of business/industry, NGOs and other societies and associations of citizens. The development of the National Assessment itself lasted for more than a year, including the organisation of numerous working meetings and workshops, conducting of surveys, and creation of separate Web Sites on sustainable development and the publication of bilingual brochures, etc.  With regard to the 12 session of the CSD, held in April 2004 in New York, the Ministry of Environment and Physical Planning also coordinated the development of the Report which was submitted to the National Information Analysis Unit, UN/DESA/DSD. Taking into account that at the Session three thematic areas were considered: water, sanitation and human settlements, the Working Group was established for the purpose of the Report development and included representatives of the Ministry of Agriculture, Forestry and Water Economy, the Ministry of Health, as well as of the  Sector for Physical Planning of the Ministry of Environment and Physical Planning. The Report was elaborated in accordance with the Guidelines for National Reporting to CSD 12, available at www.un.org/esa/sustdev/natlinfo.htm.  It should be noted that the Republic of Macedonia had submitted the data to CSD on the extent of Agenda 21 implementation before the 9 Session of the CSD, in the specified format - Country Profile, available at www.un.org/esa/agenda21/natlinfo/countr/macedonia/index.htm.  
15. Could you describe the national effort in the field of environmental research and development (e.g. level of funding of national institutes, etc.)? 
The interdisciplinary nature of environment protection poses difficulties with regard to the precise determination of activities and resources allocated for research aimed at its development and promotion.  The Draft Law on Environment, the adoption of which is expected by the end of the first quarter of 2005, contains a separate Chapter of provisions regulating research activities and education in the area of the environment. According to the Draft Law on Environment, the Ministry of Environment and Physical Planning provides financial support for researches related to the state of the environment and projects intended for environment protection, based on annual programme for environment promotion.  According to the Law, the funds for the Programme are provided from the Budget of the Republic of Macedonia, as well as from donations, presents, wills, foundations and other sources. The Programme specifies the conditions and the criteria for awarding funds for research activity and for the implementation of environmental projects. The funds are awarded through public competition announced by the Ministry of Environment and Physical Planning, concerning the full implementation of a given project or part of the programme activities of environmental projects. The Ministry of Environment and Physical Planning submits annual reports on the implementation of the programme for environment promotion to the Republic of Macedonia.  Scientific research, as well as innovation activities, i.e. issues of research and development, are regulated by: Law on Science and Research Activity (“Official Gazette of RM”, No.13/96, 29/02), Technological Development Enhancement and Facilitation Law (“Official Gazette of RM” No. 98/00) and Technical Culture Enhancement and Facilitation Law (“Official Gazette of RM” No. 53/00) and carried out by the Ministry of Education and Science (MES). Research and development in the field of the environment will be particularly enhanced by introducing this category in by-laws.  The draft application for the financing of scientific research projects (Form - OB 1), under item 11, requires that “the relevance of the research results to the protection and enhancement of the working and living environment, i.e. the quality of living,” is defined, which is further on evaluated in the selection process through which the funding of the scientific research project is accepted or rejected. The Programme for Technological Development for the period 2002-2006: in the section ”Priority areas for enhancement and facilitation of technological development” -“sustainable development” is defined as s priority; -  in the section “Acquisition, technology and characterization of new and modern materials”, “natural resources saving and environment protection” is defined as a priority. -  in the section “Genetic and biological research for human health promotion”, the defined priority is “stimulation of multi-disciplinary research of basic nature in order to facilitate real and permanent progress in the domains of health care and the quality of life”. in the section “Healthy food production”, the “methods, analyses, detection and control of food safety and risks of the hazardous impact of environment on human health” is defined as a priority; -  in the section “Science and sustainable development”, the defined priority refers to “the development of strategies for mitigation of adverse impacts of human activities on the environment, promotion of sustainable human settlements, environment degradation and protection”; -  in the section ”Social development and needs for new knowledge” the defined priority is “social integration and the need for the improvement of the quality of life”;   Through public competition for awarding financial resources in the form of co-financing development projects, among other projects the projects intended for the improvement of the quality of living in terms of work humanisation and environment protection are co-financed. According to the Decision on the Establishment of the Network of National Institutions in the Area of Culture (“Official Gazette of RM”, No. 84/03), the Museum of Natural Science of Macedonia is a national cultural institution, financed by the Budget of the Republic of Macedonia. According to the Law on Museums (“Official Gazette of SFRY”, Nos. 25/79, 51/88 and :Official Gazette of RM” No.12/93), its activity includes research, collection, staffing, professional and scientific processing and study, protection, keeping, dissemination and presentation of museum material, which, considering its expertise, include documents on and objects of flora, fauna and fungi of Macedonia. As such, its activity supports environment protection and promotion. The Ministry of Culture through annual programme aimed at financing the cultural projects of national interest finances the work programme of the Museum of Natural Science of Macedonia.  Environmental research and development hold prominent position in the Law on Cultural Heritage Protection (“Official Gazette of RM” No. 20/04, 71/04), where the protection of the immovable cultural heritage is carried out, inter alia, through such compulsory integration of heritage in spatial and urban plans and in plans and programmes for the environment and nature protection, as well as through its recognition as a factor of sustainable economic and social development, especially in the context of cultural tourism, housing, specific professions and education. According to this Law, cultural sites representing specific parts of the landscape, that are outstanding as areas of specific interaction between man and nature, are protected as part of the immovable cultural heritage. The same is further provided for under the European Landscape Convention, ratified by the Republic of Macedonia (“Official Gazette of RM” No. 44/03). The Law also establishes integrated protection, through a set of conservation measures and through an active inclusion of immovable cultural heritage in the life of the community, representing a factor of sustainable social development, especially in the domains of space planning and development, investment based building, environment and nature protection and improvement, etc. The Law contains series of provisions on entities that will carry out the protection of immovable cultural heritage and its surrounding against physical destruction, environment and nature pollution, as well as on measures for environmental quality improvement within protected areas.  In the period 2000-2004, the Ministry of Education and Science has financed 39 scientific research projects related to the area of environment protection, with a total value of 17.810.000 MKD, and 13 development research and innovation projects related to the environment were co-financed, their total value being 7.165.000 MKD. In the last decade, the Energy Research Centre of the Macedonian Academy of Science and Arts has worked on 14 research projects, with a total value of approximately 25.000.000 MKD, provided by the European Commission and from other foreign sources. These projects include analyses of the impacts of energy related and other technologies on the environment. In the period 2001-2004, the Ministry of Environment and Physical Planning supported around 20 scientific research projects in the area of environment protection, with a total value of approximately 8.500.000 MKD. 16. Please detail any initiatives or programmes of environmental regional co-operation in which your country is participating. In particular, outline your country’s plans to follow up on the priority projects identified by yourselves in the framework of the REReP. 
The Republic of Macedonia carries out regional cooperation as a key segment of its international political activity, through permanent strengthening of the cross-border cooperation and active participation in regional initiatives and activities under the Stability Pact. Through active regional cooperation, the Republic of Macedonia contributes towards nourishing good neighbourly relations, security, stability and environment improvement in the Region.  The Republic of Macedonia is a member of the South-East Europe Cooperation Process (SEECP); Central European Initiative (CEI); Stability Pact (SP) and South-Eastern Cooperative Initiative (SECI). The procedure for full membership in the Black Sea Economic Initiative is underway, and in the Adriatic-Ionian Initiative and Segedin Process, the Republic of Macedonia has the status of observer. In the framework of the above regional initiatives, the environment is discussed mainly in general context, as a factor that should be taken into account and that is especially stressed in the framework of the cooperation concerning the assessment of the impact of transportation corridors 8 and 10 on the environment. In the context of the so called Athens Process for the establishment of regional energy market, preparatory activities are going on for the purpose of concluding an Agreement on Energy Communities in South-Eastern Europe, containing a separate segment on the environment.  In the framework of the Segedin Process, under the Stability Pact aimed at strengthening democracy and the role of local self-government in the countries of South-Eastern European Region through the promotion of cross-border cooperation between local authorities and the establishment of Euro-Regions, there has been significant increase in the interest of the local self-government units in the Republic of Macedonia with regard to the establishment of cooperation and raising initiatives for cooperation within Euro-Regions in the last several years. As a result of past activities, the following Euro-Regions have been established: Skopje-Nis-Sofia,  Prespa-Ohrid and Prespa Park. Activities aimed at establishing additional Euro-Regions in other border municipalities are underway. The Regional Environmental Reconstruction Programme for South Eastern Europe (REReP) is an initiative in the framework of the Second Round Table of the Stability Pact and represents its main environmental component. Furthermore, it is the first initiative raised and developed by the countries in the Region, including: Albania, Bosnia and Herzegovina, Bulgaria, Macedonia, Romania, Croatia, and Serbia and Montenegro. Kosovo, as a territory under UN administration, joined the initiative later. The REReP was adopted by the Ministers of Environment from the Region, as well as by the Stability Pact representatives, in 2000. This was followed by the establishment of institutional framework and the definition of tasks for the bodies implementing the Programme. The implementation of the Programme is supervised by the Task Force composed of representatives of all participating countries and of donors. It is co-chaired by the European Commission and one of the member countries. The Republic of Macedonia was the first country to co-chair the Task Force. It participates in many regional projects, and in some of them has acted as a Lead Country.   In the framework of the Regional CARDS 2002, the Ministry of Environment and Physical Planning (MEPP) participates in the regional project aimed at capacity building in the Balkan countries, with regard to environmental reporting and EIONET development. The goal of the project is to strengthen the cooperation with the European Environmental Agency (EEA), in order to facilitate integration in the EEA’s work programme and prepare the future membership of the countries to this Agency. In addition, the Republic of Macedonia has planned its active participation in the regional CARDS 2003, for which the Terms of Reference are under development. The Republic of Macedonia participates in the initiative for development of indicative map under the Pan-European Environmental Network, coordinated by the European Centre for Nature Conservation (ECNC). The project's goal is to define the contours of the network, thus identifying the key priority areas of European importance and the existing corridors among them; it will also indicate where and how new corridors may be established in order to meet the requirements concerning linkage between key species and the locations of buffer zones and crossings, if required. The final product will be the map illustrating the natural heritage of the Region. This will also raise the awareness and the understanding of environmental networks.  The Republic of Macedonia is actively involved in the regional initiative aimed at the establishment of the Emerald Network of reas of Special Conservation Interest (ASCI), under establishment on the territories of the countries Parties to the Convention on the Conservation of European Wildlife and Natural Habitats (“Official Gazette of RM” No49/97). The project is carried out with the financial support provided by the Council of Europe. During the first phase of the project, 10% of the total number of areas of special conservation interest was covered. The second phase is expected to cover additional 30 % of the total number of sites in the Republic of Macedonia, proportionally representing different habitat types.   The Republic of Macedonia participates in the regional project for Capacity Building for Imprving the Quality of Data Inputs to National Greenhouse Gas Inventories, based on the experience/knowledge acquired by the countries of the Region that have completed their first National Communications on Climate Change under the United Nations Framework Convention on Climate Changes (UNFCCC).  The Trilateral Project for Prespa Park is a regional initiative resulting from the Declaration signed by the Prime Ministers of Republic of Macedonia, Republic of Albania and Republic of Greece in February 2000 (Prime Ministerial Declaration on the Creation of the Transboundary Prespa Park and the Environmental Protection and Sustainable Development of the Prespa Lakes). The Trilateral Prespa Park Coordination Committee has been established as its highest body. The developed Strategic Action Plan (SAP) for sustainable development of the Prespa Park has provided a basis for the initiation of multi-annual Project on Integrated management of ecosystems within the transboundary area of the Prespa Park. It is currently under implementation. The MEPP attaches high importance to the development of bilateral cooperation, including cooperation with regard to the protection, promotion and sustainable development of three natural lakes and border massifs belonging to the Republic of Macedonia and its neighbours. This cooperation contributes to the improvement of the overall transboundary cooperation. Agreements in the area of the environment were signed with all neighbouring countries: Greece (2000), Albania (2000), Bulgaria (2000), Serbia and Montenegro (2002). Within the wider Region, bilateral cooperation was established with Croatia (2002); Russian Federation (1998) and the Czech Republic (June 2004). Cooperation on bilateral basis has been initiated with Hungary, Slovenia and Ukraine. It should be pointed out that cooperation with Bavaria, as particularly intensive, has been carried out through the activity of the mixed Macedonian-Bavarian Intergovernmental Commission, which takes environmental protection  as high priority.  The transboundary cooperation is of vital importance to the development of the Region, and this has been recognised by all countries in the Region. However, there has been shortage of funds to bring such cooperation on a bilateral basis to a sufficient level. The Republic of Macedonia has acquired positive experiences through its transboundary cooperation with Greece, benefiting from the support of the European Union (EU) in the framework of the INTERREG. The initiative of the European Commission - New Neighbourhood Instrument, promoted in 2003, enabled the Republic of Macedonia to strengthen its transboundary cooperation with the Republic of Bulgaria and the Hellenic Republic and to take part in the initiative of the European Commission - INTERREG III B CADSES.  In the framework of this initiative, the Republic of Macedonia and the Republic of Bulgaria have formulated a Joint Programme Document, defining the goals, priorities and measures, as well as an indicative financial plan for the allocation of funds in 2004-2006 period, and for the improvement of the environment and protection of natural and cultural resources for the purpose of promoting sustainable development. These represent the core contents of the Programme.  The cooperation with the Republic of Greece will be based on the financial support provided through CARDS/INTERREG III A.       In the framework of the INTERREG III B CADSES Programme, the Institute of Urban Environment and Human Resources, Panthenon University in Athens, has initiated a regional project in the area of spatial planning in South Eastern Europe, aimed at developing spatial and territorial indicators and actions for the spatial planning observatory (ESTIA- SPOSE European Space Territorial Indicators and Actions to the Spatial Planning Observatory in Southeast Europe).  The Republic of Macedonia has taken an active part in the process of the establishment, development and implementation of the Regional Environmental Programme (REReP), which proved to be a successful and supportive mechanism for the implementation of institutional reforms and a basis for regional cooperation promotion. The Stabilisation and Association Process (SAP) induced certain changes in the implementation mechanism of the REReP, so that now it assists countries in meeting their obligations, especially obligations in regional context. In the framework of priority areas under the REReP, the Republic of Macedonia has identified the following projects/activities: REReP Projects for institutional strengthening/capacity building – some of the priorities have already been included in the planning for the CARDS Programme and their commencement is expected. For the purpose of inclusion of the country in the Community programmes in the area of the environment -LIFE, projects and activities are carried out for the purpose of institutional capacity building and enhancing the absorption capacity of the country. Assistance is also needed for institutional strengthening related to the process of further harmonisation of the national legislation with the EU law and the achievement of the relevant EU standards. REReP regional projects – projects at regional level and transboundary projects play a key role in the context of the regional cooperation development, providing for experience and information exchange. This has been provided, for example, through the Balkan Environmental Regulatory Compliance and Enforcement Network (BERCEN), through cooperation with the European Environmental Agency (EEA), etc. In the framework of this priority, during the last meeting of the REReP Task Force, held in October 2004, in Belgrade, Serbia and Montenegro, the representatives of the countries participating in the Programme, presented the possible areas for cooperation in a transboundary context. 
REReP infrastructure projects – the Republic of Macedonia has identified a number of infrastructure projects in the area of the environment, under the REReP Project 1.2 or, to be more precise, under the Priority Environmental Investment Programme (PEIP). These are related to the implementation of the EU high cost directives. Resources required for the implementation of these projects are enormous compared to the funds available in the national budget. On the other hand, such projects may not be implemented through grants, nor fully financed through bilateral donations, and the Republic of Macedonia currently does not participate in the ISPA or other pre-accession programme. According to the announcements made during the last meeting of the REReP ask Force, held in October 2004 in Belgrade, the Infrastructure Steering Group will have more active role in the management and provision of the funds required for the implementation of the projects identified in the Priority Environmental Investment Programme (PEIP). 